C) Death of Wife.
And no wonder.
Cleo is telling me it's time to play. I guess I'll do that for a little while before showering and getting myself gathered for the rest of the day.
Twixt teeth and tongue
38) do you have stars on your underwear? becuase your butt is out of this world!
Of the scenery, I need say but little. A great proportion of our route lay over an uninteresting pine-covered country, but there were frequent towns springing up along the line which will doubtless become more and more frequent…’
Andy bent down and took her bar of soap and started soaping up Olivia’s legs one at a time with long firm strokes while her two friends each held Olivia by the arms. Andy started to kiss and nibble at Olivia’s lovely firm ass which was right in front of her face. She then slipped her tongue between her butt cheeks and darted it in and out while going up and down her butt. She continued moving the soap upward from her legs and started to soap up Olivia’s ass with firm massage like motions. She made sure to carefully soap up her asshole and as the running water ran down Olivia’s butt crack, Andy would flick her butt hole with her tongue and re-apply the soap. In the meantime, the other two girls were nibbling at Olivia’s ears and soaping up her upper body paying special attention to her breasts and hardening nipples. Olivia was covered with quite a bit of soap at this point. The girls turned her around and Andy judiciously soaped up her soft bush.
A- An actor in that class will take 200% of the normal damage when attacked with the selected element.
"Your coughing was brilliant," David said.
Young Catherine was left to learn the navigation of Russian imperial court life herself, dealing with the vain and unpredictable Elizabeth as well as her immature and unprepared young fiancé. Even after the pair were married – and Catherine had grown into an attractive young woman – the marriage went unconsummated and the heir Elizabeth had essentially ordered up did not appear.
As we are now less than 10 days away from flying off to China to bring our daughter, Mei, home I have been so blessed to read the words of David Platt, author of "Radical" and pastor of The Church at Brook Hills, as he and his wife are in China right now bringing home their newly adopted daughter. He wrote on his blog (here) yesterday some powerful and poignant words that serve to me even now as reminders of why we're so crazy for "this adoption thing". It isn't because we just love kids or because want a big family. We adopt because we have been adopted by our ever-loving, Almighty Father. We love because he has first loved us. We see more clearly now than ever just what Abba Father has done for us and want so desperately to enter into that same love and sacrifice that he has shown and done for us.
Having not seen the film in so long has granted me the honour of seeing it from a semi-fresh perspective. In addition, I got to utilize my newly acquired penchant for all-things sleazy and salacious. I mean, I was surprised by how much I embraced Heather Chandler this time around. Her domineering brand of bitchery was probably off-putting ten years ago, but now I find her to be strangely alluring. In case anyone doesn't know, she's the leader of the most powerful clique at Westerburg High and is played with a tyrannical zestfulness by Kim Walker. The alpha Heather (a.k.a. The Red Heather) is the character who launches the film into a cattish wonderland, full of mean spiritedness and hideous blazers. She also spews some of the film's most memorable lines...
This author weaves an intricate story and makes this book something more than a novel about the Titanic with a romantic ending. This author made a massive book with three parts and very emotional contents. For the first half of the book I was fighting back tears and for the remaining half of the book I was trying not to destroy my nails from chewing on them.
1) Imagine being in elementary school and knowing an answer, what do you do? -Raise your hand.
I have wanted to make marshmallows for a while. I love the "artisan" marshmallows that you can buy at specialty stores, they're so much more flavorful than grocery store marshmallows without that funny chemical taste. But they're not exactly cheap, I think Williams Somoma had a small box for $15 last time I checked. Seriously?
I am veeeeeery sleepy and not up to explaining cellular automata or meta-rules or the serendipitous exploration of logical spaces, or what the buttons actually do, or anything. I wrote down some words on the page that probably say some things.
My pre-k kids still have problems with identifying numerals, so I used the song "Five Butterflies" by Tiana to have the children look at the number and go to drink from the "daffodil" when it was their turn, as well as showing the other students in the room the number on their butterfly. The "daffodil" was made from a yellow tablecloth bought at a Party Store. Here is the video if you'd like to see us doing the song:
Well, with Louis having to leave early, he kind of rushed the program yesterday, and we’ve already done the forest. That was the bit at the end yesterday. We’ll go to the lake this morning, but it’s a boat tour with a set itinerary and there’s not much else to do there.
Good morning Lovelies! I hope everyone had a great and relaxing weekend. The weather was awesome here so we soaked it all in!
“Rock it to the break of daaaaay
So I don’t remember exactly which one of us brought up the topic (more likely it was she, when she’d read about it somewhere), but imagine my delight when the Girl recently asked me, “What is calligraphy?” and “Do you know how to do it? Can you teach me?” So out came my old calligraphy set, with the pen nibs and ink cartridges dried out, and the practice pad of paper that had sat idly for almost ten years.
I don’t do typical too well, but I have one constant in my writing life. Before I sit down to write, I play with my dog, Rylee. She’s a rescue Weimaraner, and while I don’t know her history, I figure she must have had some sort of serious abandonment issues. If I don’t cuddle with her before I write, she tries to crawl into my lap. All 60 pounds of her.
Sobering conclusion - no matter what we do, the war is already and irrevocably lost. Unless we want the USArmy to complete its transformation and turn into the Waffen-SS.
I suppose that is possible. You tell me.
1920-2010
- What could be more life changing than millions of people giving up their misguided enjoyment of rap, AOR (album oriented rock, for Rummy in El Prado) and general pop schlock for the organic vibrations of Skiffle?
1) Do the buzzers work?
The snake – 16 inches long and the thickness of a little finger – is now being studied at the Life Sciences Department at China's West Normal University in Nanchang.
Photography allows us to see and record the world with particular and personal nuances, asserting itself as an art and not just a method to record images... READ MORE
From Rosedale you could ride up Bush Road for a little mountainbiking at The Royal Albany Trails or explore the greenways at the base of the scenic reserve. These run in both directions from Bush Road but you’ll have to duck down some residential streets to access them.
Fax: (03) 9744 5721
Heads up world here we come!
First of all, I have to tell you that you guys ROCK! I so appreciate all the great sources for chandeliers- I looked at every one you suggested and have lots of new ideas. The Horchow sale ends tomorrow, but I'm not ready to make a purchase yet, so we'll see . . . Thank you so much for your helpful feedback! Here's a hug for ya!
Justice is colorblind. Too bad our society no longer is after the multi-culti hogwash that has bread out of us the notion that we are all American, but we are now a check-the-box ethnicity. The folks who went out of their way to brand George Zimmerman as a “white Hispanic” as opposed to “Hispanic” will now have to eat their words.
The Relay for Life event is not only about sadness and death. To lighten up the event there were a couple joyful things going on during the night. Entertainment Unlimited was selling cotton candy and Sigma Pi fraternity brought a bounce house to the event for participants to bounce around in for a bit. Sigma’cappella and Makin’ Treble, two a cappella groups on campus, performed during the event with songs by well-known artists like Adele and Beyonce. The big special event that took up part of the night was the Relay Pageant. Both male and female students competed showing off their talents in front of the crowd.
Suppose then that the psychopath and his new partner now lead a life of sleaze, of colluding against others, of luring victims, duping them, rating them, berating them, making fun of them, gossiping about them to others, using them and dumping them: all this to boost their inflated egos and to fulfill their perverse sexual fantasies. Couching their sleazy lives in terms of “libertinage” or mores that are “beyond good and evil,” they feed and mirror each other’s narcissistic delusions, engaging in all sorts of perversions: wife swapping, sex parties, group sex, adult dating websites, etc. Ask yourself: what healthy person leads such a sordid life and what healthy partner would put up with it, much less enjoy it? Underneath the mantra of libertinage what you see is a pathetic reality of two narcissistic sex addicts and social predators being each other’s sloppy 10,000 seconds and getting their jollies from preying on other people like them or, worse yet, on unsuspecting innocent victims.
1 tone
P.S. In the interest of fairness, I feel that I should also mention the overwhelming amount of positive feedback I've gotten in the last few days. For every hate-filled email or comment I've received, there have been at least 100 supportive and wonderful emails/comments. Even my rigorous hatred-withstanding training could not have gotten me through this without you guys. Thank you. You make me love the internet so much that my face hurts.
Brendan Dolan, 37, Glen Rock, N.J.
and we will be keeping an EYE on her blog for updates!
Now she is suing CVS Pharmacy for False Imprisonment, Defamation and more. Her attorney, Jeff Benton, said her arrest could have been prevented had proper procedures been followed.
The menu and the planned walk would make a great basis for a sponsored walk or for customers to follow … hopefully to work up a (wo)man-sized appetite for all that lovely food you are going to offer and a thirst for the local ales you stock.
Showing me places,
Poetry is one of my favorite forms of expression. It wields strength by virtue of its delicacy. It invigorates through its fragility. It expresses majesty in its simplicity. And in the seemingly quiet white space between and among the lines, poetry resonates with emotion, imagination, and universal truths.
Is it a fun film? Yes. It is an exciting film? Yes. Is it a touching film? Yes. Is it a film that you'll connect with? Yes, especially if you grew up during the Seventies like I did. Especially if you knew kids that had ideas bigger than their resources. Especially if you can sympathize with a family dynamic that is either riotously messy or desperately quiet.
Unable to withstand the misery any longer she placed the howling infant in the lap of the other child and dragged herself to the nearest garbage can.
In another incident, LeSage said the pet owner cannot afford to have the pellet removed from the cat, and she is looking into options to help the cat owner.
Mae softened a little. She smiled. What'll it be?
Crystal and I usually are shopping at 5 am but not this year...she's a little busy with the baby so I did some shopping with my son, Michael.
Respect should be something that begins at home and carries along to all other facets of life. Modeling respect is one of the best ways to earn respect from your students. I know that as an adult, if I am treated respectfully I am going to treat that person the same way in return. (of course... it is much harder to treat rude people (HUGE pet peeve!!) with respect, but they deserve the same :) The problem is... our kids come from so many different walks of life. Mom, Dad, grandma, cousins, etc. might not be present in your students' lives. Consistency is so important, especially at this young age, to reinforce these life skills. WE as teachers might be the only consistency our kids have from day to day.
revisionist history
The reason the PICC line was stopped and the femoral line was put in was for two reasons. #1 she was too dehydrated so her veins were shot and #2 her body was under too much stress and she stopped breathing during the procedure.
Eliza Presley is only sharing tweets with approved followers.
Converse: Thrift store $1
Of course, I'm not saying those dark books aren't out there. Problem novels have been a staple of the YA cannon since the genre was first identified 40 years ago. And I'm also not saying that some of those problem novels aren't graphic or dealing with some difficult topics. If the topics seem more gruesome today, it's because they are no longer quite as taboo as they once were. Incest and child molestation has always existed, but people often (especially in the past) refuse to talk or acknowledge it. Teens cut themselves, fight addiction, deal with eating disorders and homosexuality. It may not be commonplace, but for the teens experiencing these problems, the pain is very real. However, nowadays people are better informed about these topics, both the causes and the effects. It's less surprising that such subjects now find their way into a very small portion of YA literature. After all, all literature is a reflection of the society which creates it. YA literature is no exception.
i glance down at the words that are scribbled in markers and crayons every shade of the rainbow... the words reading, "You are Loved".
Sam shot her sister a glare. She didn't want to deal with an argument, not on their glorious day. She wished Abby wasn't so impatient and that she held her tongue better when she was mad. But that was how her sister had always been.
Another way to grow in your gift is to report to the member of your pastoral staff at church that would be in charge of volunteers in the church. Share with them your discovery and ask them for materials to study and opportunities for service. Perhaps there is someone that they know that could mentor you in this gift.
Living in the Positive Possibilities:
“At that wedding in Cana”, Jesus is reported as saying, “it was sweltering. People were drinking water like it were wine, it was that hot.”
I love challenges and I often take part in them. Sometimes the effects are really surprising.
Gus Lynch
Do you ever look at something and find yourself fixated for a few seconds longer than normal as you think to yourself, "What's That ?!" This week's project comes to us from Afroditi Krassa, a talented designer that is really making a name for herself. It was published in ReMake It in 2010.
Congratulations to all the A to Z-ers! I have the Linky List on my sidebar and plan to continue my blog visits following down the list. I've found some amazing new bloggers this month. This has been a fantastic Challenge this year. I have loved participating and being part of the hosting team.
Yes, I said “decompress AND celebrate.” I PHreakin’ did it, which is nice! I finished my novel! I got to the end! I came in over 50,000 words, thank goodness.
anyway, I'm finally home for a bit, after truly terrible two days of journey. it included cancelled flights, going to different airports, massive delays, missing connecting flights by 10min, freezing while wating for transport to the hotel on a cold night in munich, more dalays, etc etc. they say in such circumstances acceptance is the only path to serenity, but it's easier said than done.
But all the pretty boys and girls at prAna, with their peace sign necklaces and fair trade hemp pants in earth tones, and the faint scent of patchouli, were marketing the “spring line.” Yeah. Just like Chanel and Rodarte and J. Crew, prAna has a spring collection.
That went to help the sea.
Our conscious thoughts are not the start of any action, they are the result of a whole mass of stuff going on in the body and brain before we become aware of them. Our thoughts can, of course, affect our emotions and vice versa, and even create feedback loops, which intensifies both, but they are rarely the starting point.
might with this shy earth
Captain Cook and Johnny Carson, Harry Truman! True!
One of the characters in Angel's Fury is terribly bullied, another grew past it. It was hard putting myself in the position of the bully, too easy to put myself in the position of the bullied ...
letting me feel
Overall, I think xenophilia is a good thing. It's good to learn to love strange and foreign things...as long as it doesn't turn into an obsession that has you churning out Quibblers and hunting Crumple-Horned Snorkacks in your free time.
Who cares? We've got the songs, there'll be enough for everybody. All of my problems are solved.
Big splash, Brodus takes care of Hunico, and Hornswoggle adds a little Tadpole for good measure.
of state in his cartoons without violating the constitution and the
“We were out on a bike ride in the spring of 2009 when we passed an amazing contemporary house beside a listed Norman abbey,” recalls Emily, an economist. Inspired by what they had seen, the Hunts posted a note through the door of the house, asking who had designed the three storey property. In return they received an email putting them in touch with Halliday Clark Architects in Bradford. “We explained that we wanted to build something smaller, in a similar style and for a much lower budget, and Adam Clark was extremely excited about the idea,” says Tom.
2 Corinthians 3:16-18
Not sure how this has happened, well I think I do.
First, we got another negative test result. I felt that I had more symptoms than ever last month was really hopeful that we were going to get our positive result. It was pretty shattering when I found out I wasn’t pregnant. That was immediately followed by one of the most painful periods I’ve ever experienced. It just felt so cruel.
At the end of the above stanza, she startles the reader with “Opening the lid, your eyes are my eyes”. In the final couplet, she returns to the image of the eyes with: “Lowering the lid, I catch your scent, / breathe you in, and out again.” She has perfect control over both the poem and the reader.
Why is the book so brilliant? Because of the superlative writing. Turin and Sanchez write perfect, poised, epigrammatic sentences, as steely and as soaringly beautiful as a suspension bridge. Who but Turin would describe a perfume in aeronautical terms? ('This thing is so huge, gleaming, overengineered, and chock-full of counterrotating planetary gears that you feel all you can do is let it tower over you while you walk around it and kick the huge tires': Ubar.)
DENIS BEAUDOIN: I just remember her saying when I donated that the doctor told her that she had to keep it warm by putting it between her — between her breasts — just to keep it warm, keep it room temperature until she took it in.
On a more blog related note – I wanted to say a Thank You to everyone who has supported my efforts with getting this far in the 365 Challenge. Yesterday wordpress notified me that I’d achieved my 1,000th ‘Like’ which is actually quite fantastic! Each day there is new activity here whether that’s a follower, or a comment and so on. Today I reached 150 followers, that means that 150 of you potentially could see my work – which is just – wow! So thank you to everyone. I appreciate it and it really has given me the boost to keep going at times. I apologise I have nothing better to offer you than Rain today! And on that note…here is some more!
They beyond Pleased Us. They led the British Invasion like a glorious stampede we just couldn’t get enough of. Before the bitterness of Nam when for just a brief moment in time we were still thought of as innocent. But as we entered the revolution of the mid-60s it was the Beatles that continued writing the soundtrack………until they decided to pass the torch.
in those lost hours
1/2 cup Oats
This is a sandiwara of domestic terrorism, and Bersih and Ambiga are using the Raklyat as a human shield insteasd of honestly filing charges against the perpetrators of bad laws honourably – one-on-one – IN COURT, LIKE GENTLEFOLK. That education and support is WASTED on ‘Bersih leaders’. Bersih leaders are bad citizens and saboteurs of the poorly read! Use the international legal framework (the local framework isn’t working so contact the Universities who awarded the Supreme Court Judges degrees to blackball these legal pariahs causing unconstitutional harm to the citizens of an entire nation, remove their degrees). You marching fakes !
So far I've read Stolen (review here), Ultraviolet (review coming), Goliath (reviewish thing here), Hexed and today I picked up 3 books from the library. It's been wonderful, glorious and relaxing experience. I recommend it to every reader. Heck if you want my hastily thrown together button modified for your birthstone (or month of choice) just leave me a comment and I'll make you one. I feel that strongly that everyone should make time for the books that they really love.
Thomas Neuroth - Keyboards
To conclude, there are different McDonald’s/Fast food menus for various countries. The form of Americanization differs in countries as fast food restaurants take in various cultural aspects of food in countries. They amend their America fast food culture to fit in to other countries’ food culture and thus, creating new fast food cultures and menus in countries globally.
It’s Thursday. The Lord and the twelve have arrived at a borrowed room to celebrate the Passover Feast together. For the customary washing of the feet before the meal, a bowl and towel are there, but no servant appears. Jesus assigns himself the task. However, he comes on his knees to Simon Peter and the big fisherman says in surprise, “YOU wash MY feet? To him that would be unthinkable. Jesus was his leader and leaders don’t do such menial tasks.
Tomato-Basil Pasta Salad
sauterne reduced to half with 1 pinch pepper and 1 T of shallots (blanched and chopped) as well as 1 pint of Espagnole sauce (a butter and flour thickened meat sauce), reduced for 5 minutes to which is added 1 T chopped parsley”.
I see my sister with her friends. The girls perched on their bikes as another boy whose name I can’t recall, fires water from a water gun into their laughing smiles.
Blomstene er så forskjellige
“You should talk more, you have a nice voice.” He said. Peter would just be so damn cute and say weird compliments like that. He was young and very sweet.
We are constantly asked to be lovers of self. Fast food restaurants make it as easy as possible to get their food into your mouth. They do everything but feed it to you. Marketing companies beg us to think of ourselves first rather than others. Like a mantra they tout the "Me" message. It's all about you, they say. Don't worry about others needs, you must have this product. Buy it, you'll see. It'll make you feel good.
The TeAL team found that it wasn’t a good idea simply to ask cold. The first responses tended to be cursory, vague and conservative. It became clear that academics needed a conversation with TeAL team prior to completing the form, in order to apprise them of the possibilities and create an appetite for change. TeAL tried to arrange a presence at programme meetings etc.
To wit: Randi embraced seclusion after her mentor underwent a savage beating which left him mentally handicapped.
oh parenting.
Just the right depth,
Confusion wasn’t supposed to be like this. In real life it’s never this clear cut, as though the shutters have come down 73 years before and nothing since is visible.
Galangal – fresh – 6 slices
Here's the recipe.
As I was shoveling the driveway this morning I was thinking that shoveling snow is much like grief work. I have been digging myself out of the snow and digging myself out of grief every three to five days only to get dumped on by both once again.
small glass jar with lid
Oh. You. Have. GOT. To. Be. KIDDING! ME!
In the January 2012 episode, actor Mike Daisey tells the story of his trip to Shenzhen, China where millions of Chinese workers work in near slavery conditions to assemble the various tech products, clothing, and toys that we Americans bring home by the cartload. He tells the story of the unconventional strategies that he used to get inside the Foxconn factory that assembles iPhones, Macbooks, and other assorted Apple products. He reveals his firsthand account of a country where human labor is so cheap that even our most high-tech gadgets are assembled by hand – millions of hands crippled by performing the same task on an assembly line for hours on end. He describes a massive building with security guards at the exits and nets strung up on the sides of the building in response to a recent surge in employee suicides. He tells us of the dorms where employees sleep – twelve foot square rooms with fourteen beds stacked floor to ceiling – each bunk space so narrow that one can only slide in “coffin-style.”
We watched a movie in autotech. The Dark Knight. That’s a good one.
Iván Meade - What is the most practical thing you own and what is the most rare?
Banners and Flowers
Review Time! The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer by Michelle Hodkin was a 2011 YA Debut. However it was only published in Australia in February this year. The cover of this book is just gorgeous and I'm not going to lie - I wanted to read the book just because of the cover although the blurb sounded pretty good too! Purchase your copy at The Book Depository - US Edition/ AUS Edition. Thanks to Simon and Schuster for the review copy!
that he was cut off out of the land of the living,
The Objection
They showed the kids how to get away from a grown ups' hold if they were grabbed, what to do in all positions if another child was attacking him, or holding him, scripts to use when they were being bullied, proper use and protection of their own body. It was the whole package, so to say, proper body conditioning, how to defend themselves, how to fight, if necessary, and the mental conditioning as well.
Well, it turns out, we missed the "Eternal slavery for sick and disabled people" Clause. (Clause 54) You know, it was busy, we had a lot on our plate, we had to keep taking naps. It was obvious we would miss something - possibly enforced euthanasia for puppies or the National rollout of a new eugencis programme, so in a way, it's a relief it's only eternal slavery. At least if we're lucky "Masser" might let us have a drink now and then, a bit of nice balm for the chaffing of the chains.
The Father loves Jesus because He lays down His life in order to take it up again… God loves Him because He is following the plan set forward. But it is not this, it is the next part… The one that talks about whose accord by which all of this is done. Jesus says that no one takes His life from Him, He freely gives it up and dies of His own accord. He alone has the power to lay it down and the power to take it up, as this was commanded by the Father. See this is interesting to me, because we spend a lot of time giving Judas a bad name because he betrayed Jesus. He delivered Jesus to the enemy by treachery according to Merriam-Webster online. See all of the definitions here. But is this really what happened? In order for Judas to betray Jesus, did not Judas have to have power over Jesus? We talk about Judas betraying Jesus and we hear this each week in the celebration of the Eucharist, “In the night in which He was betrayed…” I do not think this is the real meaning of what happened here. Jesus told Judas to go and do what you must at the last supper, which was to go to the high priest and lead them to Jesus. Judas did not have the power, Jesus did. Jesus tells us here in John 10 that He lays down His life of His own accord, Pilot doesn’t take it from Him, Judas doesn’t take it from Him, Jesus has the power. That night in the garden, Judas does not betray Him (one definition for the Greek), Judas hands Him over (another definition of the Greek). Sure you might say this is semantics. But who’s accord is it? Who has the power? Jesus does and He is not betrayed, Judas performs the task of handing Him over so that the plan can be done…
7:00 – Elysian Fields, Doveman @ (le) poisson rouge $15 (18+)
Self-verification theory does not argue that positive feedback isn’t tempting for those with negative self-views. The theory posits that all individuals are initially drawn to positive feedback. Individuals with negative self-views, however, then compare this positive feedback to their own self-views. It is only during this later phase that preference for congruent feedback emerges. Researchers have found that this comparison process (juxtaposing feedback to self-views) requires energy or effort. If you deprive people of this energy, for example by making them do a difficult task (like rehearsing a novel phone number), individuals with negative self-views prefer positive feedback just like everyone else (Swann, 1990).
Here’s what has happened in Georgia in the last year or so, after the legislature went trying to meddle with the sensitive dynamics of supply/demand in agricultural labor markets.
Even if you don’t care to relive my experience, if you are a Christian who desires an “outsiders” perception of Christians and Christianity, you should read this book. There is at times “colorful language.” The author covers the topics of sex, drugs, alcohol, masturbation…a host of topics common to ALL colleges, even the most conservative of colleges. He does not include anything for “reactionary” value, but only as much as is necessary to accurately portray the Christian’s response to these moral concerns.
5. Really? Can we all stop tweeting about the poor Segway guy? It seems like he was a good and smart man and after about the 58th mention, it seemed cruel.
March 2003 – November 2003 (Contract Work)
I feel like I should stop there, but there is so much more to say.... Pouring down rain, off we went to the Caribbean. Lush, with spontaneous waterfalls, a wonderful SLOTH sighting, and monkey sightings. Jorge maneuvered the bus towards our little hotel... Ok, maybe we got lost once. Ultimately, we made it safe and sound. There was no jacuzzi for jacuzzi-boozie time, so we made do with just boozie.... Resourceful, eh?
The story behind this bit of Christmas craftiness is that we're switching from curtains to blinds in our kitchen, and currently have empty windows with the curtain rails and hooks still in place.... I've always loved making paper snowflakes to stick on the inside of our windows at Christmas but our current flat has such old single-glazed windows that we get terrible condensation, making paper snowflakes a no-go. A snowflake curtain seemed the obvious solution :)
Put oven rack in middle area of the oven.
The London listed diamond miner pointed out, however, that $16 million have reversed since the period end due to the strengthening of the rand. Production was up 64% to 953,553 carats.
For the record, Dole ran with President Gerald Ford as his vice presidential choice and together they lost to Jimmy Carter in 1976. Later he ran as the GOP candidate for president in 1996 and lost to Bill Clinton.
Now the stamps. Plenty of them and variegated!
Thanks for all of the support over the last couple years its been invaluable.
Mother: "I don't even know why I married him at the first place."
Be careful biting into them. That peanut butter is hot hot hot!
2 cups unbleached flour
Butte Creek Brewing Co
Hello, blog world. I have an internet connection! This is pretty exciting news when you have had to wait SIX WEEKS for it. Insert swearing about BT here…
In the groggy state that I was in I told him that nothing can be opened until the brothers are awake too.
If you decide to watch The Hangover and then get offended, you're an idiot. Worse, I suspect you were secretly looking forward to the opportunity to talk about how you don't really find crude humor that funny the entire time.
One of the most important things you must do is envision success.
I know I always say this but... my card was really fun to make - I was going to color the apples red then decided to do something unexpected and use green, my favorite color. I colored the apples with Copic markers YG01, YG21, YG23, E44, E42, E40, T3,T5. The papers used are Copic X Press It, Via Vellum Leaf Green & Basic Black, the patterned paper was printed on Mohawk Bright White Color Copy 110 lb cover stock and is from Digital Delights by Louby Loo's Spring Has Sprung digital paper pack. I also used a Papertrey Ink scalloped edge die, black grossgrain ribbon and a couple of stamps from the Lil Inker's set Rainbow & Cloud Sentiments.
Not everyone accepted the gift. I know of several same-sex weddings depopulated by the neutron bomb of homophobia. When Angela and Mary (not their real names) wed, Angela's mother Shirley refused to attend on vaguely religious grounds. I’ve met Shirley many times: She’s a frail, sweet, slightly foggy old woman who seems to have had a hard life. The year before the wedding, she had to stay with Angela and Mary for months while recovering from a serious illness, a period that was a financial and emotional burden for Mary, who is the breadwinner of the family. As the months wore on, Shirley witnessed the daily accumulation of caring acts that forms a family; but despite depending on this family structure in her return to health, Shirley never accepted the relationship.
1/2 t. cayanne pepper
And that little bit of rambling is all there is for now, folks.
Debra Jaliman, M.D., author of the upcoming book Skin Rules: Trade Secrets from a Top New York Dermatologist, has practiced dermatology in New York City for over twenty-five years, and also teaches at Mount Sinai Medical Center, where she is an attending physician. Her own best advertisement for her advice, Jaliman has appeared on local and national television shows, including Good Morning America and Nightline. She lives in New York City.
Bharati Vidyapeeth’s Poona College of Pharmacy, Erandwane, Pune, India.
For the right faith is, that we believe and confess: that our Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of God, is God and Man;
“The Bourne Legacy” starring Jeremy Renner is also on my potential bust list. Look, I was never a huge fan of the “Bourne” series, but I think they’re on a little thin ice all of a sudden saying “There was never just one.”
I met with all of the staff today that have helped me along on my journey. Along with that, I met with my psychologist who gave me this bound book that she put together. It is entitled ‘Letters from the heart’ and contains every single email correspondence that we’ve had between us since October 2010. In some ways, our ‘email therapy’ was more thorough and honest that our face-to-face therapy. I opened up so much in the letters to her. Found it much easier to communicate this way. Along with about 60 emails she has printed off, she also wrote me a letter just inside of the book. it reads:
4 No Two Ways 5:43
The palate displays malt and ripe fruit flavours with this delicious balanced sweetness and a Ryvita/ malt finish.
... Ahhhhhhh....
How many times have you been asked, “How are you?” and you found yourself mustering a smile and “I’m fine” when inside you were really feeling quite sad or worried? While it is not always the right time, person or place to divulge your feelings, and in many ways our society discourages doing so, unmasking your emotions also offers many gifts.
Park spent his last moments Tuesday night with his father, who is suffering from cancer, Yonhap said.
I swear by the time this baby is born and from the amount of steps we have in this house,I am going to have calves of steel!!!!
If you don't do it yourself, no one will do it for you.
Well, I say “buy a pie”, but the truth is that my school had a tradition which might be unique: the meat and potato pie sandwich.
Not much has changed on the leisure activities front. I have made little progress on my writing, 3D modelling, 2D animation or game programming Although I have made a decision Game Programming wise, which was to do with which program I should be programming with. I have decided to stick with Game Maker 8 as opposed to Construct 2. Construct 2 is easier to use and is more compatible, but I can't build more advanced games. And I already have started my current project with Game Maker 8 anyway.
Before we went to the park earlier, Zac wanted to get creative in the kitchen, luckily I had bought some Christmas star biscuits at the weekend for him to decorate (the ones that come with icing). Here he is:
3) Does a non-leather purse speak of modest means? And is there a reason for these dirty looks at my square-shaped hot pink bag? (I bet it’s envy. Yes.)
My mother was brought up in a family of 13 children, in poverty that is unfathomable for modern people. My maternal grandfather was the eldest son in a well-off family, he fell in love with one of their maids - my maternal grandmother. As a result, my maternal great grandfather disinherited my grandfather. My grandmother died when giving birth to their 13th child during burning WW2 due to a sloppy and drunken doctor. My mother was 12 years old when she had to assume the role of mother to her own siblings.
I can pick and choose what to share.
Cliff Peanut Butter Bar – haven’t tried yet, but I’m always up for new bars, hahaha
If only his crazy-ratios weren't the same as Newt's. Well-well, these are the three I’d at least buy a beer and expect, during the conversation, to hear some interesting (if at least half jibbering loopy) things.
Pigment and tinting technology is an area that is constantly changing. In consultation with ICC, Midas Earthcote have developed technologically advanced blue oxides that offer a high degree of fade-resistance when exposed to UV rays. Midas Earthcote constantly upgrades its paint recipes in pace with tinting technologies to ensure that their systems offer world-leading coating solutions.
And so we come to my next and final point—my concept of work.
Senna Park, Wildomar
My wine is an oaked chardonnay (white) that tastes equally sour and bitter, and had vanilla, butter, citrus, smokey, and toasty aromas. It is medium-bodied, so the food should match that intensity (not too heavy and not too light). My goals are to bring down the bitter in the wine slightly, and to enhance the vanilla and butter aromas. I wrote a theory paper on this, which you can read here.
Amber Kingsnorth – Both. On one hand we don’t have a long company history behind us, or an extensive portfolio to demonstrate our skills. The need to prove ourselves only makes us work that much harder. We’re both professionally registered interior designers, and build on that accreditation through continued education and involvement in the design community.
Adams said he hadn't talked with Zeigler about the incident but described the chief as "a mild-mannered, soft-spoken person."
The neighbors had, up to this point, been too polite to mention Moody’s incarceration. Now, however, after a fourteen-minute visit from the sheriff, she was sure all the people up and down the cul-de-sac were pointing sly fingers at her.
I have so much to share since my last post.
Also, if you'd like to check out the new challenge at Tickled Pink Stamps challenge blog this week it's all about using chipboard. I've used some Maya snowflake chipboard and covered them with a nice blue and distressed the edges with brown, popped a little button on top and voila! Easy embellie!!
It’s amazing what a difference three little letters makes, sometimes.
On a crochet note, though, I will forever be thankful for organizations such as Project Linus. I would like to ask you to please support Project Linus in the 2010 Craft for A Cause contest! They could win $50,000! How great would that be for such a wonderful crochet organization! Please click HERE to go to the Joann's Craft For A Cause website and vote! You can vote once per day on their website until December 4, 2010. Please take a moment each day and vote. $50,000 could go a very long way for such an independent organization!
“The EC will also cooperate with other agencies including the National Registration Department, the armed forces, police and Mimos in cleaning up the electoral roll,” he said.
“It seemed almost like people playing bowls, rolling the great balls along, and the boat stopped. Then the frightful tearing noise of steam escaping, and I heard people running along the deck outside my windows, but laughing and quite gay.” Her husband, sleeping in another cabin, had heard nothing and was annoyed to be woken up by her.
Deer and i wanted to do something special
As the sun disappears below the tree line, I cross the road to Pembroke Lodge, the car park now largely empty save for a few lingering visitors. From the viewpoint on King Henry’s Mound, the light is too dim and the air too hazy from the woodsmoke emanating from Sidmouth Wood for St Paul’s Cathedral to be visible through the keyhole. But in the opposite direction, the lights of west London are laid out like a glittery carpet in the twilight. Now fading to black in the gloom, I can just make out some of the landmarks beyond the dim silhouettes of the Cedars in Petersham Park immediately below: the steely ribbon of the twisting Thames, reflecting the little remaining daylight; Ham House, Twickenham Stadium and Heathrow Airport, above which twinkling navigation lights in the darkening sky mark the trajectories of steeply ascending aircraft, only a few miles distant. Framed by the graceful limbs of shadowy beech trees, the leaves of which rustle soothingly in the gentle breeze, this must be one of the finest views in London. Beautiful.
But why is the land itself left so faceless? It's “forest” full stop, perhaps grudgingly modified by being evergreens or light/heavy? It's the brown dull little triangles of “mountains” arranged in hexagonally-bordered bands. The wildly-varying and satisfyingly-creepy real world spread of wetlands is rendered “swamp”.
In a Chronicle column “Alumns: Withhold your support,” senior Steven Miller writes:
Introduced by Jayne in her comment on the recent "Worry" post, we will look at vigilance, which I have come to believe is not the same as paying attention. Not the same at all.
By the time I was onto the 4th act, John Otway, I was in my element and I shot some of my favourite performance photos to date.
Then we have ceramic artist Mary Harding's Celebration giveaway. She's celebrating being on the cover of Stringing magazine by giving away two daisy pendants (one of them pictured above).
You see when you look at life after creating a list such as this. You get to put things into perspective and realize that other stuff is just peanuts compared to what really matters.
Row 1) ch1, hdc in same st and in next 9sts
It was a tool mostly used by the U.S. Navy and commercially by the telegraph companies. It was from the ashes of a De Forest company that the United Wireless Telegraph Company was formed in 1906. It heralded dozens of receiving stations throughout the country and, in particular, three in New York. Their corporate office at 42 Broadway was one, extremely convenient to the offices of the major passenger ship lines of the Cunard (25 Broadway) and the White Star (9 Broadway). They had another out at the luxury hotel spot Manhattan Beach, Brooklyn, where some wealthy New Yorkers spent the summers.
A. oil change every 3000 miles
Sir Leo – Thank you to all the support you have given me during the transition.
Update: Cheryl and Co. has contacted me to send me a replacement for my order. I must say I am impressed with the timely response and nice people working there! :)
and odie mama.
5. Hardware Switch
I love you. Because of you, what you do, and what you have been through people around the world will look at their lives differently and make changes. Thank you for inspiring me.
Asian print dress, Forever 21 (swapped). Black tights, Gap. Patent mary janes, Xhilaration. Triple strand, faux pearl necklace, JC Penney. Red bead necklace, Xhilaration
Don't forget to check out basically bare and leave me a comment on my "Exam" post on March 7th. You still have a chance to win their Grand Prize!!
Alina Starkov has never been good at anything. But when her regiment is attacked on the Fold and her best friend is brutally injured, Alina reveals a dormant power that saves his life—a power that could be the key to setting her war-ravaged country free. Wrenched from everything she knows, Alina is whisked away to the royal court to be trained as a member of the Grisha, the magical elite led by the mysterious Darkling.
His second book of short stories, Household worms (described by himself as “intermittently dreary”) has recently been published, and I am waiting for it to arrive in the post. As you might expect, it is a collection of short stories musing on modern urban life, and presenting it in a not entirely positive light.
I fancied making yet another strawberry and white chocolate tiramisu but I was short of time so I decided to do a variation of my very rapid muffin recipe. Not that muffins take any time at all to put together, but this recipe is mega quick and easy. It had blueberries in the original recipe so I just switched to strawberries.
happening, I had to abandon my
The overwhelming majority of these children are teenagers. Nobody wants teens. They come with baggage. They may never call you "mom" or "dad." They may have attitudes. They may be surly. They may have developmental problems and they may have emotional needs.
He went out of his bedroom, and down the stairs, ready to face the world.
The biggest problem about gambling in Ontario is it’s an old system developed around old strategies that no longer work. The two major Ontario casinos, Niagara and Rama were strategically placed close to the US border. As gambling researcher Dr. Robert Williams explains:
(I recommend one of those paper signs taped to your back)
This was to be my first entry to a monthly challenge for 'We Should Cocoa' November's challenge set by Chele at Chocolate Teapot Every challenge is chocolate but every month another ingredient is given and we have to conjure up something yummy. I did say was to be my first entry. Unfortunately I have just discovered I am late. I hope Choclette and Chele will forgive me. I have had a terrible month. My 90yr old Mother in law had a massive heart attack. She is as tough as old boots and thankfully is making a wonderful recovery. That said I have been run off my feet looking after her and as I look after my two grandchildren as well the kitchen has only briefly seen me throwing something together something very quickly for an evening meal. However, I have succeeded in organising things fairly well and today is mine. So with apologies for my late entry here is my submission. These don't look as wonderful as they taste. I based the recipe on Vi's Oaties which is lovely in itself and wonderful recipe to have a fiddle with. These were chewy with just the right amount of crunch The caramel in them was divine. With thanks to the Choclette and Chele. for a great idea.
In any case, loved the TWO meals I got out of Yamadaya for under $15, and will definitely be back way too much. It's hard to make a gourmet meal for party of one and make it worth my time -and I'm unfortunately not big on eating the same thing for days - once it goes into the fridge, aka black hole for leftovers, it's pretty much dead to me. But next day leftovers as tasty as Yamadaya's fried rice - I'll make a point not to forget. So, Ramen Yamadaya is such a great option for busy people like me who just want to have a quick but delicious meal, cooked with care - ready when you are, and no dishes to take care of after!
Full of spunk and wry humor, Jamie made for a great protagonist that I could root for and relate to. After arriving at Little Bly, it doesn't take Jamie long to get drawn into the mystery surrounding the deaths of her predecessor, Jessie, and her boyfriend, Pete, especially considering Jaime's uncanny resemblance to Jessie. Jamie is understandably curious and her intense desire to comprehend what had happened was tangible and transcended the pages into myself. Her insecurities were realistic and avoided being over done to the point of annoyance. While I know that some people were, I was never bothered by Jamie's pill addiction and, in fact, I felt it added both to the story and to Jaime's character. Isa, though a bit strange, was absolutely darling and I couldn't help but love her. Milo was annoying, slightly creepy, and arrogant though he did surprise me by his occasional depth of thought and I found him to be a captivating character. Sebastian was a character I could have seen myself falling in love with had he played a bigger role in the overall story as I found myself wanting more of him. Mrs. Hubbard, Emory, Aidan, Noogie, and others formed the rest of the cast of distinct, well-crafted supporting characters. I have to say, Griffin managed to neatly, and impressively, compact a significant quantity of characters into Tighter's brief length of only 216 pages while still allowing them all to contribute.
This is why I love blue skies. You end up with stunning pictures..:D
After the first time I threatened to do it, I eventually got some responses making sure I was ok. But no-one rushed, and it really saddened me. If I had seen such a message, I wouldn’t have sent a pathetic text or phoned in the morning. I would have rushed straight round and leant on the doorbell until I was let in. Obviously I’m an exceptionally good friend.
We no longer can count on defenders, on leaders. There are only overlords, the Quislings who see their advantage in political correctness and population replacement.
So, I suggest that I provide to you the Top 10 Men that We Should All Be Grateful For In Terms of Sheer Yumminess (BESIDES George Clooney, who is clearly the Apex Of All Things That Are Smokin' Hot; Amen):
It really is a beautiful thing.
Islamic Jihad said they will launch attacks on Israel if their terrorist Adnan dies from starvation.
-Who in clothing 2: older men
I promise I won't make a habit of it.
Nothing too spectacular here but was it worth two quarters? I'd say so.
“I’m glad to be speaking at the conference. I’ll probably tie-in my grandfather’s stay in Amsterdam a hundred years earlier where he was a social revolutionary. I might talk about how non-duality is called an inner revolution by J. Krishnamurti, a revolution of the heart by Jeannie Zandi, or love’s quiet revolution by Scott Kiloby.
The race organizers had chosen cancer to be the “exclusive” disease to benefit from the day’s profits and publicity, so our little autoimmune disease was even farther below the radar than usual with the people in charge. No official I talked to at the staging area had any clue who we were or where we should go. In essence, without a tumor, we were personas non grata.
How can I explain myself
Hillcrest Cemetery is the setting for storytelling as local townspeople, dressed in costumes of the day, re-enacting roles of Holly Springs' most illustrious characters at the Annual Holly Springs Pilgrimage, held every year in April. You can take a walking tour of the cemetery and here stories related to those interred here.
It’s a shame Australian television is never consistently good because for most of these paragraphs are going to read like report cards ‘TV Burp has a lot of potential it just needs to apply itself more’, ‘If Hungry Beast can stop itself from getting distracted it will do better next year’, ‘The Jesters needs to wear more appropriate shoes’, and so on.
Our pre-bedtime run to the bathroom was indeed our most interesting ever. With flashlights in hand and flipflops on feet, we each exclaimed something or another at the same time as we opened the bathroom door. What came out most clearly was E's, "Look! A scorpion!" I'd noted a large spider. V pointed out a frog just outside the door. The spider was notable for its size (though hardly a fraction of a tarantula - still interestingly large), but the "scorpion" was a crawdad/crayfish that had found its way into the girls' room. Freaky!
My own family has a farm in south-central Virginia, on the banks of the Nottaway River that has substantial indigenous artifacts dating at least to 6000 BCE. I spent much of my childhood summers walking the fields after a rain or after a plow following the rows, head down, looking for a newly up-turned projectile point. Our family always felt a sense of ownership over those old pieces of worked rock, which as I got older left me with greater, and greater unease. Cactus Hill, one of a handful of pre-Clovis sites in the Americas, is just 10 miles away. Though family interests have worked against it, I’ve always wanted a professional dig done in the sandy peanut soils of our farm. Part of this is simple curiosity, peaked more after the discovery of Cactus Hill. But part of it is a lingering feeling that the gorgeous projectile points, axe heads, and the like that formed my early Neolithic imagination were part of a patrimony that stretched beyond my family, beyond the arrival of Europeans to Virginia’s shores, and even beyond the sedentary groups of indigenous people who were ravaged by disease, warfare, and social disruption in the years leading up to and after those Europeans’ arrival.
How long did it take you to write your book?
There is a lot of buzz about this movement to provide child-free experiences in places like airplanes, restaurants, and grocery stores. I have lots of issues with it, but by far the most upsetting thing is that some people have started calling these restrictions Brat Bans.
Thingtak
sum peepil say that the woild will cum to u end. Wee ar bee coming cleveru bi maykin things bit wee ont uwar ubaout the plooshin for the woild when makin thins. And wee shod start wokin together lyk bees and the umerocins ur beeg priks. To hulp the woild hyuris ulitil sayn I madup. Work togeeth for ur world s
restaurant that her daddy painted her nails...not her mommy! Love it!!
Ava decides she wants to enter the same alligator wrestling competitions her mother entered. Her mother won a national championship in 1971. Ava starts sending inquiries by mail. Her dad continues to wear the headdress all the time:
And love me as great women can
Finally, a day where I did everything I was supposed to. And it felt great. Woke up on time this morning and ate my breakfast. Which, I will be honest, I had a pretty hard time getting down. It was a Whole Wheat Pita and Cottage Cheese Roll-Up which consisted of half of a whole wheat pita with a 1/2 cup of cottage cheese spread on it, and then two slices of tomato. You're apparently supposed to roll this up, but there was no way it was rolling...I just kind of folded it in half. Anyway, I also had an orange with it. I posted before about how I have a hard time with cottage cheese if there isn't enough of something else to disguise the flavor/texture, and there definitely was not with this breakfast. I found myself gagging a couple times trying to get it down. Won't be having this one again...
This leaves me and my husband. I dress in black lace, leather and pretty stockings and, you know.
Nov 10th – HMV Ritz, Manchester
“Death is a natural part of life.”
The plot revolves around some key linear ideas, which end up getting lost in all of the lackluster random trekking done within the series.
My usual posts are more about our every-day lives, and while John and I enjoy our daily life, it’s not quite as thrilling as being on vacation. Apart from my blog getting Freshly Pressed this morning, which was very exciting for me, the highlights of my day today have been (1) not getting rained on when I walked Maxwell this morning, and (2) trying out our brand new vegetable peeler on a lunchtime carrot. (The peeler had an excellently smooth and fluid cutting feel; with its ceramic blade and dishwasher-safeness, I highly recommend it if you’re looking for one.) (The carrot was also excellent.)
A Woman in the Polar Night by Christiane Ritter (D&M Publishers)
When he was caught out there was no remorse. He still thought he was right and thought God was wrong. In fact in the last part of verse 5: “Cain was very wroth, and his countenance fell.” So sure was he that he was right even when God offered to provide a sacrifice for him.
A while back, Salon’s Alex Pareene used Murphy’s career to suggest that “there are, in the mass media, absolutely no consequences for blatant, constant lying.” Public Editor Brisbane’s column, however, reveals something even more shameful: that the public editor of the nation’s most influential newspaper could consider such a figure suitable to provide guidance to journalists.
It is not always easy to make good food choices with a family. From one of my favorite blogs, Self's Eat Like Me dated 4/11/11 posted by Cristin Dillon RD, I found this healthy grocery list:
And so I was up.
If you are still doubting or questioning, here are some bible verses to check out. They are linked to an online bible, so just click and read.
The spinner is a very simple design with just a bolt glued onto the back of it, which is attached to a magnet on a spinner. So you can place it on a magnetic whiteboard and it will stick, and then give it a spin. After drawing the rest of the spinner “fields” on your whiteboard, it can be used like any spinner. If you would like to see a little video of this spinner in action, just check my HeidiSongs Facebook page! It’s pretty neat. I noticed that on Amazon, they sell these spinners in packs of three for $19.99. I can’t imagine what they were thinking of; what teacher is going to need three of them when you can clearly only ever use one at a time? Some of the sellers on Amazon and also my friend Dave at The Learning Shop has split them up into singles and only charges $7.99 plus shipping for each one. I don’t know what he charges for the shipping, but the spinners are light so it couldn’t be much. If you want to order one, you can fax them an order at 1. 317.842.1723 or call them at 1.800.369.6792.
Any such event is combined with weather change. The clouds filled the sky. Though the breeze became cooler the atmosphere remained stuffy.
Now that the puppies are gone, well mostly... I've had a wee bit more time. Unless you count breaking the riding lawn mower and having to push a supposed self propelled mower that broke the self propelled part the same day.
Isaiah 7:14
Instead of being boxed into certain assumptions that were tried and true formulas in media texts, Tarantino bucked the trend by challenging the assertion that these assumptions made existing organization of social relations appear natural and inevitable.
A couple of months ago, someone (I think it was Arielle Greenberg? or Danielle Pafunda?) posted on facebook a few lines from LR’s book The Men, with a superlative gush about how much she loved it. I loved the excerpt she posted so much that I ordered the book. It is strange that I didn’t have it. I had heard her read from it many years ago at a Segue reading, at that same reading where I had made my awkward introduction to her. I had been interested in the poem, but there was something about LR’s elegant and distanced way of reading it aloud that kept it at arms’ length from me. Interestingly, I wrote my own “the men” poem a couple of years later. I knew that my poem (“Orgone Gophers,” which appeared in Folly) owed some debt to hers, but mine was so different, goofily bop-prosodic, neologistically bumbling, that it seemed
The movie briefly shifts the action to the island itself, where Muffy is hauling around some creepy props. An older woman named Clara is helping her, but looks concerned. Before Clara leaves to take a ferry to the mainland, Muffy says something rather ominous about the weekend with her friends being "bloody unforgettable".
This race will come down to the last day of canvassing. The truth is, when people hear about Glen, they vote for him. Out of 90,000 potential voters, we only reach 2% on social media outlets. Glen’s opponents have money. They have sent mailers and are now engaged in radio ads.
That response was not entirely new. Earlier when Jesus asked the twelve if they would leave him as some of his other followers were doing, Peter blurted out with the same depth of feeling, “To whom else can we go? You have the words of eternal life.” His love and connections were real!
After two hours of hard work the tattoo was complete. The colors shone brightly on her smooth skin. She inspected the work with her deep intense eyes and smiled. Handing over the money he had quoted she walked out without a second glance.
So, here I started out making wads of used Kleenex on my desk and deciding what to bitch about this morning... and still got all (slightly) introspective despite myself. I'm sure I'll get over it soon.
On Saturday we saw an odd site. Yes, that is a Tow Boat assisting a sailboat. How often do you see a sailboat getting towed? Especially on a breezy day? Can't they operate under wind power? Isn't that the point of a sailboat?
Stir in the cilantro and lime juice. Serve.
ISBN: 978-0-8478-5808-8
Mr. Chang: They’re not going to voluntarily relinquish it, but when they feel that the end is near, these guys are going to get on planes and take their money with them. And that’s what’s happening right now, there’s a lot of money coming out of China.
Can we claim his lordship and still be involved in this demonized activity? It is the same spirit that has contended against God for the souls of man since we were created. That same spirit, Satan, works to turn man away from Holy God, and towards these false gods.
Samples of food and I chose to do relays! Bad choice on my part.
‘”You know that the rulers of the nations lord it over them, and those in high position enslave them. It shall not be so among you; but whoever would be great among you must be the servant.” Note that he makes no distinction or reservation. All national rulers, no matter what the nation or the political regime, lord it over their subjects. There can be no political power without tyranny. This is plain and certain for Jesus. When there are rulers and great leaders, there can be no such thing as good political power. Here again power is called into question. Power corrupts.’
they hang the hearts on the recipients doorknob
Chomu Press; Quentin S Crisp
We were blessed to spend time with family that we haven't seen for along time and enjoyed a warm Christmas. Here a few of the pictures. I haven't post lately but I am going to start again and so you few readers aren't so bored with my once a month or so post!
Many people suggested to me that it is good to make sure you have a drink at the (self-service) bar, as selectors like to see how you relate to fellow candidates (though they didn’t seem to use it themselves, so I’m not sure how!) I had a soft drink the first night, but departed early to my very comfortable room. It was good to have time to phone home and talk to the family, and get an early night – I didn’t look at the Pastoral Exercise that night, just made best use of the peace and quiet.
could it happen one day?
NAACP WISCONSIN:
2 tsp smoked papricka
Those who find beautiful meanings in beautiful things are the cultivated. For these there is hope. They are the elect to whom beautiful things mean only beauty.
Reminder: The second "Sunlit Sunday" link up is this weekend. I hope you'll consider participating. You'll be able to do so as of Saturday at 7 pm, Eastern Standard Time. (The first "Sunlit Sunday" is here.)
The edited play should find these details and work them into the action. The characters could move slower and develop in a creepy yet normal way. I don’t think that the play needs the mob. I don’t think it needs the sacrificial virgin. I don’t think it needs a literal outside of the restaurant. This would be a great chamber play, and Hopper’s painting is usually read that way – locked up, full of tension ready to bubble and bust. Something must always be wrong even though everything seems ritualized and pedestrian.
Sheridan worked Westside long enough to see a few cases involving advertising people. He often wondered why more of them weren’t murdered. As far as he could tell, they were for the most part loud, petty, egotistical, annoying and self-loathing. And those were their good traits. He figured the city, which was essentially a company town, made them that way. They all liked to consider advertising a part of the entertainment community. They all thought they were in show business. But the truth was they were just on the periphery of it. If you could call commercials for Swedish furniture stores, Japanese car manufacturers and fast food burger joints show business. No, Sheridan thought, these were, on the whole, people who made a lot of money for contributing nothing to society but volumes of visual and verbal pollution.
But I was especially moved by a passage toward the end when the father Anthony Brinkley is in his studio. A bird painter all his life, he is contemplating the dozens of winged skeletons that dangle from his rafters. Rachel wants them removed, saying they are gloomy, but Anthony resists:
A former Chinese language teacher was jailed for 10 years and ordered to be given six strokes of the cane on Monday for molesting two boys and performing oral sex on an eight-year-old in school.
I’m sorry, friends around the world, but I am too old to learn new tricks. I want to know how long it is going to take to get to New York City. Using “miles” helps me figure that out. Seeing 1,329 kilometers or whatever the hell is correct, would just fry my brain.
NEXT
They must be made to answer for their crimes.
I like Kate, not only does she always dress very fashionable, but she also obviously has quite sexy legs.
George Griffith / from Outlaws of the Air / 184
"People from all over the world send our laboratory samples of organic material that they have dug out of the ground and we measure how much carbon-14 is left in them. Based on that measurement, and knowing the radiocarbon half-life, we calculate how much time must have passed since the samples had the same amount of carbon-14 as plants and animals living today."
Did you know that July is National Ice Cream Month? Not that I really need an excuse to eat more ice cream when the temperatures are climbing near 90 every day, but ok if you insist! There's a food holiday just about every day of the year, and to be honest, I have no idea how those holidays are designated, or by whom. When I Googled this one though, I discovered that Ronald Reagan actually declared July National Ice Cream Month back in 1984. Fun fact of the day :) His proclamation said that we should celebrate with "appropriate ceremonies and activities." Surely, making homemade ice cream would fall within that category, right?
that knows no bounds
"-of Federas. I've heard of you." Rissad's voice was hoarse. Rel pondered an oddity; in his viewing, he'd seen two faces for Rissad all the way through his incarceration, the 'hidden' one suggesting the Gatemaker had remained in total control, guided by some plan or other, throughout. There was no sign of that here. With a bitter grin, Rissad finished, "What brings you to my humble abode? Chag?"
FREE
Just an observation.
But the other night, during my re-watch, I realised something that I believe puts District 9 over the edge. The lighting. One of the most difficult things to do right in graphics is lighting. Most filmmakers try to avoid well lit shots that involve CG. The reason is that if you don’t have the light source coming from exactly the right place, the shot looks fake. Basically, you shouldn’t be able to do shots like this without a budget higher than some countries GDP:
You might know this weird dude as the lead singer of the almighty, flute-rocking 70’s band Jethro Tull, which rocked my other-lead-instrument-than-guitar-seeking mind and universe. Besides being the first artist to introduce the flute to rock and still look bad-ass while soloing the shit outta that bitch, he has always expressed a colorful, eccentric and playful personality which, obviously, is heavily
I told him to spare me the tales of his frisking otters and to get a move on. Five minutes later, I was back at Judy’s side, only she was distracted for a moment, picking bits of pink fluff from her ostrich’s costume where she’d rubbed up against Graham Norton’s bird.
As the last American troops were exiting Iraq late last year, international scholars were entering. Professor Elizabeth Stone of Stony Brook University in New York is one such scholar and is leading a team bent on finding a window into the everyday lives of ancient Mesopotamians near where the Great Ziggurrat of Ur stands.
Whitman’s wife Kathy taught at Lanier High School, but like many teachers, she had a summer job–in her case as a telephone operator working the 6-to-10pm shift. On the evening of July 31, 1966, while Kathy was at work, Whitman typed up his suicide note, where he explained his plan to kill his wife and mother, and asked that an autopsy be performed on him after his death, in order to determine if a brain tumor was causing the irrational behavior he’d been having lately. Whitman had been taking depression medications to little effect for some time, and had even admitted to a psychiatrist at UT’s University Health Center that he wanted to “start shooting people with a deer rifle,” but nothing came of this confession.
Holy cow! Can you believe there's only about 8 weeks (or hopefully a little less) until Jaxon arrives?! This pregnancy has flown by but I have a feeling the next few weeks are just going to crawl until his due date. Thank goodness I have some holidays in the meantime to help make the time pass by more quickly.
I'm not really complaining **cough ... bullsh*t**. I'm just busy. So if you don't hear from me in the next few weeks ... here's what I'm doing:
Released in the early morning of the Thatcher era, Gypsy Blood is a towering monument to the failure of Punk. Working loosely within the Classic Rock idiom, on this recording (their second LP, following the speed-fuelled sonic claustrophobia of Remember- a relentless, dualistic masterpiece of horror and beauty) Doll By Doll blended elements of pub-rock, doo-wop, folk, country, psychedelia, gospel, early-60s pop melodrama, and the Velvet Underground, added their own unique guitar ferocity (albeit tempered here) and a late-70s dynamic production sheen (think Born To Run or Bat Out Of Hell). The result is a singular work of breathtaking magnificence, capped by the sweeping power of Jackie Leven's vocals.
TOLD YOU IT WAS GONNA BE A GOOD DAY - BELIEVE!!!!
The lady finally pulled her young male friends’ arm, and they walked out of the bar together. My girlfriend stood there a moment perplexed, but continued sipping her rum and coke. The guy stayed by the lady’s side the entire time.
all of us together, if we had
NYC’s most eligible bachelor, Brit Bencher, is also known as The Slayer for his reputation in the boardroom…and the bedroom. And he’ll do anything to take care of his family, even seduce high-powered corporate attorney Tori Anderson in the hopes of getting her to reveal confidential information about one of her clients. But for the first time in his life, he finds he’s falling for a woman.
"Bryan came in cleaning kegs, like everybody does, scrubbing kegs, working side by side with Paul, helping out and learning the importance of cleanliness and exact careful brewing techniques," Greg says. "He demonstrated he could do the job when Paul retired."
The husband works so much that he is tired on the two (sometimes three) days that he is home so we shop for groceries, drink Starbucks coffee and lounge around.
The events of the past few years of my life are not common knowledge. There are still friends hearing about it. Some of them are people I've not seen or been in touch with for several years. I still find myself thinking "How on earth did they find out?!" and yet there is some part of me that is thankful that most of them have reacted with concern and caring.
For example, we have a San Angelo Writer's group that just started last month.
Of course if you wanted you could make the brownies and cookies from scratch but seeing as it’s finals season, we don’t have that much time so onward!
Timing - never my strong point. But I predict it will be just right on 10 May.
I use the word “sign(s)” with a parenthetical “s”… why? Because a planet is in more than one sign! The space within a single sign contains many subdivisions where other signs are prominent within it. To learn more about this, start with my article on variations within a single sign. Luckily, the main sign in the normal zodiac is the most important. You should also at least also consider the sign the planet occupies in the navamsha subdivision when you are assessing if the sign occupied by the lord of a house is positive or negative for that house.
I have other beefs. They regularly schedule some of us for over 40 hours a week-- and then complain that we have lots of overtime. They are getting worse and worse about stocking. The fact that they've gone from having three drivers delivering to one-- they bragged at the last meeting that one of the drivers, who was, according to co-workers the best and most reliable-- was fired for "excessive overtime." Yeah, hilarious. So we all hoard supplies, knowing we may have trouble doing treatment if we don't have those supplies, or take longer to do them-- incurring more overtime-- if we don't have them. And we are constantly being criticized for hoarding supplies.
My Islam is Haile Selassie riding the Lion of Judah
When hanging out with my historical fictioneering friends, I sometimes feel a bit inferior. So many of them spent their student years reading Defoe, Joyce and Greene, or Clarendon, Elton and Schama, at least when the pubs were closed. I've dipped into both myself, a little, but I got my degree by pretending to be a tree.
Building the Great Wall of China along this eastern interior boundary would be the most practical long term solution, but I suppose an undertaking of such a magnitude will not only be financially unachievable, - it will also be unfairly classified by the liberal worldview as a racist construction. The ANC regime will not only oppose such a venture with all their might, backed for sure by their liberal supporters, - they will also place one obstacle after the next at every conference table where these matters will be discussed.
You can click on Nyootv.com and watch the trailer of ‘Agent Vinod’. NyooTV provides you a complete theatrical feeling being online. It’s like treasure for viewers having more than 1,70,000 video uploaded. You have to only click and watch and get entertained. A huge collection of full length Bolywood movies, trailers of forthcoming Bollywood movies, TV shows (old and new), music videos (old and new). You can also watch them in high definition for free. Daily updates on Bollywood events and gossips as you check out videos on all Bollywood Events, Bollywood & page 3 Parties, Music Launch, Bollywood trailers. NyooTV’s host of social media features brings together entertainment with social networking sites like Facebook, Twitter and MySpace. Viewers can share their favorite videos with their friends on their Facebook walls and Twitter update. They can invite their friends to join them on Nyootv.com for fun and entertainment as they can choose to like, dislike or share a video with their friends and have loads of entertainment only on NyooTV.com!
Maple syrup
The fastest twitch and strongest MU’s are not called upon to lift the weight at all.
Best of luck to you and look in the mirror – you are looking at an awesome person!
The latest New York Times story about Solyndra is fairly open and honest regarding the Obama administration’s complicity in the $500 million boondoggle, but the Times’ headline writer is still in “protect Obama” mode:
Three more people died when security forces fired on crowds protesting against the attack.
As for Claremont nostalj, in a manner befitting the “incident” emails we’ve received many times over (yeah, you remember those. The ones about the genitalia-exposing man in a green sweatshirt? Or the continual threat that is Scott Wilbur? Or the perennial favorite “Scissor me Scrippsies”?) we got an email today from this vague UC administration listserv called merely “Communications” relating to us the matter of recent explosions on campus. I’d comment more on it, but I think the little news article (link below) on it sums thing up pretty nicely. In short, ohhh you graduate student chemists….
If you're a cosplay or Manga / Anime fan, you're probably trying to find the PERFECT socks or stockings to make you into the character of your choice. Same goes for if you like regular comics.
To make the crisp, spread the apples in a pan, and then pour the flour/sugar mixture on top until it covers all the apples.
Great article Max. If I ever met your banking chum, I would tell him the following: A Bank manager invites a small businessman into his office. The bank manager
Just when you thought that the world of rock music has fallen off the ledge to the depths of mordor, along comes Birth of Joy. These cats hail from the Netherlands. A three piece band. Full of gargantuan tone, riffs and Hammond. Yes... my brothers and sisters! That’s right! The Hammond tone! The cool thing about this band is, there seems to be something very exclusive with way the Hammond gets treated on these recordings. I have one word that can describe it. Righteous! One of the best mixed albums I’ve heard in awhile. You can really hear the naturally tone of the instruments. And the all important snare drum mix, jumps right out too. No shenanigans or hocus pokus special effects with this production. (From what I can hear). A very true, prime and clean recording. The band describes their own music as “Supercharged” . The trio is a carpet ride back to the psych blues rock mirror window of 1967 – 1972. A nice rarity in today’s world of plastic auto-tone vocals and pro-tool software driven production.
Third, mothers, take time to read to your children. Starting from the cradle, read to your sons and daughters. Remember what the poet said, “You may have tangible wealth untold; Caskets of jewels and coffers of gold. Richer than I you can never be–I had a mother who read to me” (Strickland Gillilan, “The Reading Mother”). You will plant a love for good literature and a real love for the scriptures if you will read to your children regularly.
Ive moved to a great new house and turned it into a home.
Head over to the main challenge blog for all the details of this weeks challenge and fab prize from this weeks sponsor
I am not celebrating.
Because, deep down, I thought I could be a wonderful house-husband. For years, my lovely wife had cooked and cleaned and kept a wonderful house while I worked in Cubicle-Land. Here was my chance to repay her and do all the house-y work she had done.
"Why *can't* I?"
I am proud of the fact that I usually never raised an eyebrow during the thousands of books we read, stories we told, and episodes of "Thomas the Tank Engine" and "Dora the Explorer" we watched.
'cos there's fire in my shoes
A popular hashtag on Fridays is #FF, for "Follow Friday," used for suggesting other users to follow. Check out the follow recommendations from people you like following, and you may find some new ones to add to your follow list. (@DiandraMae explained at the meeting that while an @ is kind of like the "To:" in an email, a hashtag is like a subject. You don't have to use a hashtag, but it's a way to follow a subject.)
I remember Rhys singing at the top of his lungs all through a mommy and me yoga class when he was about 2 months old. We caught a little of his crazy high pitched singing voice on video . . . but not nearly as much as I would have if I'd fully realized at the time that he wouldn't be doing it for all that long.
If I can't get the double IPA, I'll take the Pale Ale. Nose is metallic, funky hops, and cardboard. With Bell's reputation and the dust on the bottle, I take it this beer has sat in the fridge for quite some time, or maybe warmed up. Clear straw color. The taste is a warmish hoppiness with an English PA smoothness. Lemony and grapefruit hops. No rating as I think it's just over-aged.
sandals - target
I hope you have a blessed Thanksgiving! Talk at you on Monday!
This challenge does not need to be completed each day in October. Do a day as your feel comfortable. Thank you for joining me.
For years, the spotlight on body image and imposed standards of beauty has been on women. Now however, an increasing number of young men will stop at nothing in the pursuit to achieve the male muscular ideal.
Your songs seem particularly well suited to this region. Is that by design? To what extent, if any, does the physical environment of Northern New Mexico, specifically your neck of the woods, influence the music you create?
The Catharsis. For my hope
Apply a layer of spread to one side of the sandwich. Gently lay the sandwich, spread side down, in the hot pan. Keep pressing down with a spatula so that the ingredients melt together. When the bottom of the sandwich has browned, put spread on the top layer of bread and flip the sandwich over.
Great beer. Stylish and attractive design. A nice mascot too, it's the whole package.
What? Those are birds and fighting them would still be illegal? Silly, these are Canadian Geese! They’re immigrants – and migrant ones at that. Everyone knows the laws don’t apply to them!
Bouncing babies. Remember those years? Or perhaps you are in the middle of them. I remember bouncing, rocking, walking, and driving around colicky babies. I remember waking Rich in the middle of the night, at my wits' end, asking him to take over. I remember being guarded in how I spoke and the tone I used when my babies were babies--and still today. I didn’t always succeed, then or now, but I also remember asking my kids, time and time again, for forgiveness. Why? Probably because I had a Tigger Mother who refused to be harsh with me, and whenever she failed or thought she had failed, she was quick to ask my forgiveness. Imagine that: Parents who don’t expect perfection because they know they can’t live up to such a ridick-orous notion! Parents who, through their own failings, point their children to the salvation only achieved through the blood-bought perfection of our Savior, Jesus Christ.
To reinforce the point, the term liberal tends to be synonymous with Democrat in our society because the term conservative tends to be synonymous with the Republican party. This ideological nomenclature is quite misleading, however. If one looks at the dominant platform of the Democratic party, they look like moderate Republicans of 30 to 40 years ago. Rachel Maddow, for instance, is one of these so-called moderate Republicans. My parents, in another instance, are moderate Republicans who were ousted from their party because its increasing move to the Right. So my parents look like Democrats and tend to vote Democrat. What this has reveals is a shift in thinking. The term liberal cannot really apply to a leading number of notable Democrats in the contemporary. This is the same for the term conservative, as well. Perhaps the most notable conservative is Barry Goldwater, who was pretty much what might amount to as a libertarian. At the same time, the people who hijacked his ideals were not really conservatives themselves. Most Republicans today do advocate for government intervention all the time, but it is welfare for the corporate sector and redistribution of money upwards. These people are statist and it is misleading to call them conservative. Like Noam Chomsky, I don’t believe real conservatives really exist in the United States or else they would be more adamant in challenging the forms of state authority that most Republicans tend to accept. In the end, “liberal” and “conservative” are simulacra, terms with almost no referent in real life.
The highlight of my week last week was the Kenny Chesney concert. Unbelievable.
Absolute intention?
But of course, there are flaws here and there, there are bad comments here and there, and some poeple might feel they are left behind. Let give some chance to Najib to deliver, but at the same time let us not stop praying that Malaysia will be become a successfull nation in 2020.
Notice I had to move the picture taking to the BIG bathroom mirror. Ya the other one just wasn't cutting it.
coda of the last movement utilizes themes from all four
Cuban Women’ Federation and Institute of Philosophy
Thanksgiving Dinner Is Nov. 23rd For New York City Homeless
the mental health of all those thousands of individuals who seem incapable of exhibiting any outrage at all. It’s not unreasonable to suspect that a psychiatrist would express concern if the first reaction of the next of kin of a murder victim was to stress the importance of showing the rest of the world how much love they were capable of exhibiting or started to sing in public to prove to the murderer that he/she hadn’t managed to extinguish the flame inside their
To the blue depth,
That word was INTENTION.
In order to prove to everyone that she is in fact a dancer, Jane Morgan performs her signature number at the Red Rose, Mombosa's hottest night club. As Rex and Tino sit at the bar, the former wearing a white suit and chomping on a cigar, Soledad Miranda is on stage straddling a red chair. Sporting a dress that looks it was made from loose strands of black cassette tape, and, of course, wearing her trademark silver knee-high gladiator-style sandals, Soledad wows the audience with her seated dance number. You heard right, she did the whole thing sitting down. You see, when you're look like Soledad Miranda, you don't need to particularly good at anything to win over the minds and crotches of others. After she's finished, she flirts with Rex and tells Tino that she hates hair gel.
I was told this week that my baby brother and sister (who are 15 and 13, so not really babies) are old enough to be surrounded by people who are making choices that are not quite the same standards as my parents. And having their primary care person for the summer be someone who stays up all night partying with friends playing video games and who knows what else (although I have few ideas), who doesn't have a job, or care to have a job, doesn't have goals or plans for the future besides living at home and hanging out with friends, that this is who they are offering for a role model for my teenage siblings for the summer. And, that my teenage siblings are old enough to be able to choose whether they want to be influenced by this caretaker. They are old enough to make choices deciding how they want their life to be, even if they are around this role model all day.
Soon, she gazed out the window at one of Georgetown’s stately old houses, and her mind raced back to her childhood home. She wished she could climb the worn stairs to her room, to wander the neighborhood where she’d been just another kid on the block, not the prodigy others had labeled her. She wanted to go back in time and skip rope with her friends, canoe into the marsh, and catch fiddler crabs. It had all come too quickly to an end.
Stearyldimethyl Amine – See Stearyl Alcohol.
Are Filipino workers preferred over Singaporeans because they speak better English than us? At least one Filipino ‘foreign talent’ Glenn Quilon Barrometro seems to think so.
How does Harry Houdini do it? By the magic of Hard Work.
1Then Moses and the responsible men of Israel gave the people these orders: Keep all the orders which I have given you this day;
Free Kittens recently caught up with Stephen L. Brayton, author of the novels, Beta and Night Shadows (both published by Echelon Press). When he isn’t writing, Brayton is also an experienced martial arts instructor, in addition to having a day job. He is a pretty busy guy, so we here at Free Kittens are pleased he took some time from his busy schedule to let us know a little more about him.
This is her version of the eggs....keep scrolling down for instructions and see my attempt in making these "eggs."
"Stanhope and Schroders have submitted a planning application for the redevelopment of Ruskin Square, adjacent to East Croydon Station.
He's short, heavy, weak in body and personality, and he wants to be the Big Dog so bad that he can taste it. He tries to assert what authority he can on everyone around him and nobody takes him seriously. And when he tries to flex his muscles (figuratively speaking, anyway) he goes about it all wrong.
The other money-related thing I decided to do (kind of a no-brainer) was to accept credit cards. Just like with website hosting, there are lots of credit card merchants out there. I ended up choosing Propay because they're known, not too expensive and I can use my phone to accept credit cards (necessary when you're doing craft fairs!) I also bought a "knuckle-buster" manual credit card imprinter & forms off ebay. It's important for me & customers to have a cc receipt in case they contest the charge when their statement comes. I could rig my website to accept credit cards directly through ProPay but I decided to just stick with PayPal & Google Checkout.
Name of your blog
Puneet asked, There is one more question which I often try to answer by myself. when my boss & my subordinate (whose performance is my base) is performing “Excellent” how I performed only on “Good”?
The heat of the summer is more of an issue here, than winter cold. In the enclosed part, there are doors that open to screened windows to get cross ventilation. In July and August I keep an old sheet draped over the top to shield the coop from the brutal afternoon sun, since our back yard neighbor cut down their large oak tree. Sometimes I wet the sheet down to help them keep cool, when we hit triple digits. Ameracaunas are a good hot weather breed, as they are not very big and heavy. There are usually only a few nights in the winter when we have to rig up a heat lamp. This winter I think we only used it a total of 4 nights.
For several minutes, Abby sat there hugging his hand to her chest. It was only when she heard a soft snore coming from Burrows that she snapped out of her sorrowful trance.
Ever so hopeful I dress in the morning.
5. Salt, a pinch.
dee ;o)
World Heavyweight Championship match is on now.
Journal Reference:
I sow the seeds in February previous year - in June they were big enough to replant them in separate pots. Some of them flowered and had few fruits. This spring is time to plant them in their containers – big, old wooden barrels. Last year, as I used to be the ornamental gardener, I would plant petunias or surfinias there, but this year I am drifting more and more into veggie gardening, the barrels have different guests. Strawberries will be growing on such a level, that it will be easy to pick the fruits and eat directly from the plant…
For me writing isn't just about the recognition, although it's great when praise comes, it's about the feeling of telling something. Telling something about myself, or a fictional character. Telling a story that only I can tell because it's in me. That is what's amazing about it. And when I read, I can see that feeling pouring off the page, because I know that writer felt it too, a burning desire to share something within them.
That it is no longer about you,
Up walked a Baptist preachin' southern funky school teacher... (I think)
I loved the way it looked when it came out of the oven ... the pattern from the rhubarb, the beautiful pink color, and the look of the crust dotted with sanding sugar that I had sprinkled on before baking ... and it smelled great too!
If I'm lucky there may even be a little trinket for me!
This intrigued me: "The largest wort copper is, in my opinion, too large for the boiling and proper cooking of delicate pale ales". It's not the first time that I've seen mention of special needs when boiling Pale Ales. Open coppers seem to have been usually preferred. Though I've yet to see an explanation as to exactly why. Ah . . . I think the next part about the boiling fountain my do exactly that. If the wort circulated better it would extract more bitterness. Obviously of importance when brewing Bitter.
To finish the pie with the meringue: Preheat the broiler.
Can you believe that after all I went through to get perfect vision {remember this?} I miss eyeglasses? Let me clarify. I don’t miss the poor vision or the reliance on glasses or contacts to be able to function. What I miss is having a cute pair of frames I can throw on and feel a bit…….studious when I want to.
Go now go” – Megan M. Seaman
one thing to note about this particular Arcade stick is that it is limited to 1,000 unit(s) and is available for pre-order with a maximum of 2 per individual. The said bundle retails for $249.99 USD. I already own an Arcade Stick that i’m using for Tekken and Street Fighter IV: AE and not to mention this is manufactured by Mad Catz wherein there is a huge strain in their products that doesn’t last long as compared to HORI (Rumor has it that Mad Catz controllers die after a few dish out of hadouken(s) in SF IV : AE. Regarless, fans who can spare an extra cash and have yet to own an arcade stick, this would be a good chance! Head to Club Namco by clicking the link below to preorder your copy.
As you can see there is a lot of randomness in the prairies, as well as fog. I hope your week has been as random as mine. I can't wait to hear about it.
Oh God. Oh Jesus. Now what?
I can’t so much hate this play as just not be amazed by it. Leigh’s not at his best but it’s still not a horrible piece of work. Just nothing memorable.
Do you make friends easily? “No. It’s hard to open up to people because often they’re more curious than they actually care about you.”
“Usually I realise in an afterthought that the day is a date of some significance in his life.”
And the blessings come from heaven
“One chapter at a time,” I told him. “Take it just one chapter at a time.”
"D" kept telling me he didn't like his food and baby "G" was done eating and proceeded to bang his utensils on the table. Both of them were making it really hard to have a conversation, let alone a meaningful one. Baby "G" started to cry and so I took him out of his high chair and he grabbed for my glass that the waiter had just filled to the brim and in a split second he pulled it over, onto my lap.
G’day.
Today I did something that I have always loved doing, writing in longhand. Normally I switch on the computer and tap away furiously at my laptop keys. This new WIP, needed me to revert to my long forgotten roots. When I started writing, I would write with a blue ball point pen on lined foolscap sheets. The first drafts were always on paper.
I have worked in the vet field for 14 1/2 years now. I have learned that although there are many different types of pets, there are only 3 different types of owners.
I have always maintained that when you are in a public dogfight in the media, if you are explaining, you are losing. The peak oil movement now needs to focus on planting doubt about the official cornucopian story. And, the best way to do that is continuously to poke holes in the arguments of the optimists, arguments that can be shown to be ridiculous by combining simple logic with the data that is publicly available.
5g milk powder
Smack! A troll biffed her on the head and she keeled over, dead.
(1) Print out the sheet with the Test Square (page 1 of the file).
Ellen nodded. "Maybe," she suggested, "what you really need is a new man in your life."
I, for one, have never watched an anime series for the sole sake of being a pretentious douchebag. For me, the entertainment value, characters, storyline, how it plays out, et cetera are what I tend to look for. If I do tend to get something out of what I watch, then that’s fine. At the same time, I don’t take it for granted and be an asshole about it, declaring that most people have terrible taste in anime, while trying to be on top of the world just because of some SYMBOLISM that I got from the last two confusing episodes of Evangelion. In my early days, I watched Cowboy Bebop (another title revered by the western fanbase) because it had a good story, likable characters, and fun action scenes. At the same time, I don’t hold it in high regard and be a dick about it. Also, wheres the pretension in that, western fanbase?
Eclectic elegance: found objects, well worn and loved...sprinkled with gemstones, fossils, and religious artifacts...mixed with metal. I love combining materials and techniques in non-traditional ways. I'm not formally trained in jewelry making and I believe that allows me the freedom to work without pre-conceived ideas about what I should and shouldn't be doing.
(possible new flea market to promote local businesses)
Sensing that The Boy was upset, The Book insisted that The Boy was special, and that it didn’t mean anything to show The Sister the phrase. The Boy explained that it didn’t matter if The Book enjoyed showing its magic to others, just be honest. He did not know whether or not The Book understood. All along, The Boy had told The Book that it was alright if it wanted to be read by The Sister, but all along, The Book insisted that it was something it did not want to do. The Boy was hurt, but could not logically explain why. He was puzzled and upset, having really thought this bond between book and boy a special one. And The Book insisted it was, but it didn’t not stop the interaction with his Sister, each time becoming more special, each time showing more and more magic to her. The Book and The Sister even started their own little group, a group that The Boy was excluded from.
It's a scary thing, to be launched into an unfamiliar environment, and expected to function at a high level, to control the team in order to provide the best care for the patient. It's my first day as Trauma Team Leader at the new Major Trauma Centre. I get to come to an Emergency Department (ED) I have never worked in before, with staff who have never met me before, and when a trauma is brought in by the Ambulance Service I get to tell them what to do. All night.
I am struggling with a very tough decision. It is moments like this where I wish life were much more of the 'cookie cutter mindset'.
Happy Valentine's and all that, blah, blah.
Place the dry ingredients in a nonreactive saucepan and cover with 3 1/2 cups of water. Bring to a boil over a medium-high heat, cover, turn the heat down, and simmer for 10 minutes. Allow to cool, still covered (about 1 hour).
Humor, graffiti and song are some of the first creative forms to emerge from revolutions. I have long forgotten Portugal’s revolution jokes, but I still recall graffiti images, and I can sing revolution songs from memory–including one played on national radio the morning of the military coup to signal certain army units that operations were going according to plan.
showed movie - Kyungbok and I showed the Dark Knight to students who weren't able to afford a field trip to Lindi. They remarked that the joker/ his gang with the masks were zombies. I also showed parts of Iron Man 2 to my students, and they clapped and cheered when Tony Stark put on the Iron Man suit. What a dramatic way to watch a movie.
o me this in itself is pretty alarming here is this young intelligent woman, with a job in London and what seems to be a loving family (even though some love cannot be expressed) who does what she needs to do in societies eyes but ultimately pays the price her entire life because of wondering what God would think? It just proves that too me religion is so dangerous and don’t even get me started on these lovely nuns! Sister Act they were not, women were forced to work in heavy labour jobs until the day they went into labour, not laughing, no smiling, insulting these vulnerable women, leaving the babies all night long with no feeding and no changing, no holding the babies and god forbid you give your own child a kiss goodbye! It makes me sick to the stomach especially after looking after my lovely little 2 and a half month old ‘niece’. Even after leaving the nuns behind Angela is terrified not to mention heartbroken after leaving her son to others, she is sure that being unable to conceive is God still punishing her for having sex before marriage!
At Concerts and Parades
See? It's like that every fucking day. But it won't stop me achieving. Last quarter's results from my marketing campaigns? LESS THAN NEGLIGIBLE DOWNTURN IN SALES. I will never be stopped.
United is offering double miles from Washington, D.C. (IAD) to Dublin, Ireland.
I really believe I’m closer to a "realist". Some bad things just do happen, and why should I ignore it or pretend it isn’t there just to be “positive”. I don’t find acceptance of the negative things in the world a negative action. On the flip side, I don’t believe I go looking for, and giving power to, the negative in things.
I J is so. It’s George, and I was wondering if You’re so wanted to get his I guess for the
He said he was walking down the street when a truck pulled up. He said the driver of the truck grabbed him, tied him up, then dragged him and threw him in the back. He then said he was taken out of town to an unknown location where he was untied and placed in a large beautiful cabin.
I like to cook roast cauliflower (cut into generous florets)in the same dish to take advantage of the cooking juices. The cauliflower caramelises and is so UNBELIEVABLY delicious. Squeeze loads of lemon juice and roughly cut Italian parsley all over. I dare you cauliflower sceptics not to LOVE it!!!
This is not a sob story post, not really. This is a post to celebrate her life, the life of one of the most remarkable horses I have had the privilege to love. Amalia lived for 17 and a half years, she was in working order, almost right till the end. She could have, no doubt gone further with show jumping, if we had not had our accident which got me scared, but all in all, she did it all. She proved that she was a versatile horse, able to do both show jumping and dressage, to teach newbies how to ride and to run. Run like the wind. I have never ridden a horse with her potential before and I doubt that I will ever come across one again. She was one of a kind.
4 I've Got You Under My Skin
My Tauren delved into some dungeons in March, which made it necessary for her to gain a second spec. She has also spent some time in Tanaris, and has started to become acquainted with the Silithid.
But I did cave in and get the first four episodes on DVD at the library. It didn’t cost me anything and so far I haven’t done anything with it except move it from one side of the house to the other. Giving the DVD a tour of my home made me realize that I need to sweep and/or vacuum. This lead to a whole Cookie Mouse wandering that eventually lead me to changing the sheets and running a few loads of laundry.
This is a black mixed with silverywhite and copper. It almost looks like part of a mine shaft, the copper, really stands out against the black.
One of the most intriguing and thought provoking chapters of the book is chapter eight in which the debate over whether or not humans have souls is discussed. Daniel Dennett wants us to believe that the mind is not and is merely “an illusion created by the brain (p. 109).” To this claim the authors offer several arguments:
I love children and would never wish them harm but I don’t think that my driving, cycling or walking habits are at all affected by the fact that the car in front may or may not be carrying a baby.
To contrast that, we found a blogger in Israel. This is a woman there who actually posted a photo of herself in the hallway as well, as she turned to her laptop in order to try and post while she was under fire there.
To kiss your ear wildly
When I started writing Sliding on the Edge I really wanted to express my concern and confusion over the issue of young people's self-abuse. That was the motivation; then I got hooked on the process and kept going. I don't think I planned to be a novelist; it just happened.
fill with water leaving headspace for blending without overfilling
Go along and ache
“What are you doing Thursday evening”. I had a function to cater at the Club.
LaShawn – It was hard. I felt like a caged animal, literally. There wasn’t too much I could do except get up and train, go to school during the first part, and come home. Over and over and over again. There was no income coming in. My mind was somewhere else. I didn’t know what my future in the sport was going to be, I just had to work hard and have faith. I just had a date when I knew I was going to come back and show what I could do. I knew I had to come back and be dominant. So I had to put in the work to do that. I just trained hard so I would be able to dominate when I got back.
Genetic testing of the blood is also available to help determine who may be at risk for celiac disease.
come see me:)
Hello all, DH here. Today is quite an occasion. Here are a few things that have never been said by Jen to me:
If you actually think about it trying to figure out just what exactly spring break is for can be a little daunting. There are usually two trains of thought when it boils down to the bare bones. Those are spring break is for relaxation and to let it all hang loose or spring break is a time to get all your loose ends in order and prepping for the run to the summer. Seeing as though this is my first spring break my parents wanted me to return home the week I am off mainly because they didn’t want to spend on a week vacation to Jamaica that they weren’t apart of and they missed me (still trying to get out of the few remaining vice grips my mom has on me). Since I am home they have the notion of putting me to work and cleaning up around the house all week long. Is it wrong that I see spring break as a relaxing time in between two college quarters. This is where people begin the divide on what spring break stands for.
Unfortunately, a lot of Robust God-Talk is indefensible. "The sole purpose of non-Jews is to serve Jews," said Rabbi Ovadiah Yosef. This talk is certainly robust, and delivered by someone held by many to be one of God's foremost authorities. Other God-talk, similarly robust, called for Jews not to rent their apartments to Arabs.
I am STILL having problems with blogger, can't sign off, can't leave any comments, photo uploading is being a pain too . . . sigh!
I have only read (actually listened to) one other book by Stephen Lawhead (Hood). I really liked that book so I thought that I would give The Skin Map a try. This is the first book in His series Bright Empires. Most of this book it seemed like he was settting us up for the rest of the series. We learn about Ley Lines taht are pathways between time and places. Kit meets his great-grandfather, who disappeared one day, and he introduces Kit to these lines. This whole other reality leads Kit to an adventure that is unlke anyother.
The rarest gorilla on Earth, the elusive Cross River gorilla, has been caught on film by a hidden camera trap for the first time ever.
Friday through Sunday.....
1. Go to Yaston and talk to this bard guy, who mentions boats to you. He says if you bring him a compass, he'll let you know where you can get a boat.
It’s been an unpleasant start to the season for the LA Galaxy. On Saturday night they looked more like reigning MLS champions after a 3-1 win over Portland that was topped off by a beautiful goal from David Beckham.
These kids have no experience with home schooled or unschooled persons. They have no context whatsoever and yet here they are, voicing ignorant and hasty opinions- worthless half thought out ideas, non truths.
(it'll give Alabama voters heart attacks), Mr. Obama described the call to
Pixmania connection with Dixons and Curry.
Chris Marie Green, BLOODLANDS
...one dog and one cat, to be more accurate; namely, Teddy and Soxy.
p85 “The Fastest Man Alive was ordering us to stop and breaking the fourth wall of the second dimension to deliver his plea. This was the frist time a superhero looked out from the flat picture plane into a theoretical higher dimensional space he could not see, only intuit, to ask his readers for help. He even seemed to know that he was in a comic-book publication. His world was not our own, and we were separated by a membrane as hard and permeable as Alice’s mirror. This was genuine Pop Art in its natural mass-produced Platonic form.”
YES--
We are witnessing the destruction of the nation by the environmental movement and the EPA has just provided you with the most dramatic example of that plan.
With taking a much-needed break from radio, I have been able to focus on other aspects of my journey, a key one being artistic expression. No matter if that expression means keeping kitchen cupboards neat and tidy, personally ensuring your car remains in top shape through your own efforts, planting and tending a colorful garden or creating a great symphony – these all represent varied aspects of creativity. Engaging in those activities we often call hobbies draws on the very core of who we truly are – this outside body is merely the vehicle which houses our true identity…. a unique and divine spark of the Creator. Many belief systems that have risen in modern times subscribe to the idea that a major part of our role and purpose is to experience a very unique reality for the Creator. It stands to reason, then, when we are engaged in pleasurable, hobby-like pursuits, it is in response to that inner self, a direct piece of the Creator. In short, our unique expressions of creativity are really the Creator expressing Itself through us, or in the least playing a hand for the benefit of the experience.
bill organizer inside kitchen cabinet
And it inspires me to want to try this ladder approach to embroidering a flower. I've never done it before. I've also never added front legs to my butterflies like the guy below.
4. "Rock Lobster" by the B-52's.
So stop on by Annie’s Book Stop of Worcester and purchase your copy today!!
I need to start working on organizing my photos and place an order for prints soon .
Well, I can't say I have a hero. But I get a lot of inspiration from all of you knit and crochet bloggers here on the www :)
I know one doctor who put her finger into the cervix to carry out a late abortion and felt the baby kick her. She froze and a colleague had to be called to ‘take over’.
into sections.Cut ginger into slices.
7. Stuff the envelopes. Done while watching softball & chatting about other wedding details. By far, the quickest part of the process. However, I would suggest to anybody using these doilies, fold the sides on top & bottom first. Then the sides. It makes sliding the invitation into the envelope, much less of a battle.
Manglik Dosh is of two types:
The man holding her shoved her backwards and then ducked away from her. A silver streak shot past her wide eyes. The knife clattered to the floor a short distance behind her and a thin dark line flowed down the man’s neck from his ear, soaking into his white shirt. He raised his gun again but she grabbed it and pulled it around to point at her.
Long before I arrived in my adopted home of Liverpool I was obsessed with the city.
would not murder him
Jesus was telling her that the road to relating to God no longer had to go through other people. Her parched spiritual desire would disappear due to the newly installed spiritual source. There would no longer be a need to try to find fulfillment anywhere else. There would no longer be a need to see her significance limited to the practices established by a religions system and engrained into the lives of people seeking life to the fullest extent through faith in that system. Jesus was saying that once and for all, the relationship with God she desired would be quenched, and that her satisfaction was guaranteed.
It is another blue, maybe more accurately called a teal.
“present”); and finally an unaccomplished single term in United States
In a conversation I am having with Allen from the New Hampshire Gardening Solutions blog along these lines, I said that I have become like an animal, very aware of my surroundings, but don’t have a clue as to the exact names of what the things surrounding me are. By that, I mean that I know exactly where the trees are, where the wildlife lives, and how to use the trees and the lay of the land to sneak up close to the wildlife, but it doesn’t make much of a difference if the tree I use for cover is a pine, fir, or spruce, as long as it blocks the view of wildlife as I stalk it. I guess that’s partly mental laziness as well, not bothering to remember.
Harry even defended the device by saying that his friend had died a few months earlier falling off a waterfall. As if the Traakit would have prevented that! Better his friend had been carrying a life preserver. Or rope! But the logic seems to be: If only that boy had stayed connected to his mother, he’d be alive today.
My hair is really short now.
After a quick trip through the show, I headed back to the ferry dock to head home. I did take a side trip to Ivar's for the best fish and chips in the world!
Our challenge at Lollipop Crafts this week is being sponsored by Meljen's designs. A favorite of mine to be sure. Our challenge is Mama Mia, so any project paying tribute to that special woman in your life..could be mom, grandma, mother in law, daughter who's a mom....that sort of thing
I am not a hero or Superman, only very lucky. After landing on my feet, I just knew instinctively that I was not injured, so why not enjoy a bit of self righteous arrogant indignation with the world and perpetrator all on my side? How often does an opportunity like this present itself to look like a victim and hero at the same time?
WHAT SHARON THINKS
My new favorite appetizer: Saganaki. Breaded and pan-fried Greek cheese flamed with Ouzo and extinguished with lemon. WOW! We experienced this wonderful treat at the Gypsy Cafe on the South Side. So so good!
PS:...not gonna be around for a few days,
As a way to preserve their status among the cultural elite, white people are fiercely defensive of their tastes in music, film, and literature. As such, they love to read and debate criticism of said media in order to validate their own opinions. However, it is considered gauche to simply parrot the opinions of others, so white people are forced to pick and choose which critics with whom to align themselves so as to appear neither pretentious nor uninformed. Chuck Klosterman is a popular choice among the demographic of hip, collegiate whites aged 16 to 35, as his everyman persona, conversational style, and ironically journalistic devotion to pop culture ephemera have made him a hero to the generation weaned on Saved by the Bell. Movie buffs of a populist bent favor the musings of Peter Travers, chief film critic for Rolling Stone, while whites (generally male) who would consider professional criticism as a career idolize Robert Christgau, Greil Marcus, Roger Ebert, and Pauline Kael, the leading propagators of a style which posits subjective estimation as objective fact. It is important to white people that their opinions are both seen as unique and appreciated for their insight, and they take great pride in the time and effort required to formulate their individual points of view. As a result, they often take personal offense at viewpoints which conflict with their own, and will go to great lengths to ensure that their opinions are seen as correct.
Dodger is our 6 year old husky/malamute mix. He is adorable! He makes a decent amount of messes getting into stuff while we are at work, but he is so cute I can never stay mad at him. We adopted him last June and he was REALLY overweight. We started taking him on long walks every day to help him lose weight. He looks a lot better now and is a lot more energetic and we still love taking him on long walks every night.
ah my love, ah my own,
the horseman of iron,
Clark: "Take a bite"
Idle Gossip 2:12
Cat,I command you to stop walking away!
The room wings are suspended above the new topography in perpendicular double loaded blocks, the main wing facing North and South to the distant mountain vistas and the lower West facing block overlooking the leisure deck.
Gilmartin, according to the article, said the developer plans to start on the first arena block tower, the world's tallest modular building at 34 stories, later this year. Company CEO Bruce Ratner last week allowed that the time frame could slip until 2013. It's been pushed back again and again.
HUGE thanks to the good folks at Demdaco for their vision. A couple of their designers went the extra mile on this project and their efforts completely made this line extra incredible in design, structure, and creativity. I think these might be my favorite gift product release, ever.
“Honeysuckle Rose”
I hope you enjoy your Easter weekend, let's hope we all have nice weather too and don't eat to much chocolate eggs :)
Safe hands: Dimitris, one of just 400 furriers remaining in Manhattan of around 500 in the Eighties, guides Ms Avins in the cutting process
Once again... comments? Yes?
Of all the rights of women, the greatest is to be a mother
Alex (nodding): It’s just that my mommy has penis and my daddy has a vagina.
Call Oregon gov Kitzhaber (503)378-4582
Category: 1920s Novels
Uh-oh! The big bra shop!
ULTRA FORM FITTING UPPER FOR OPTIMAL ‘OFF THE BOARD’ FEEL
Bir az aci= This will hurt a little
So, on the recommendation of a 10+ year MS “sufferer”, I have called to arrange for my 1-week in-home trial of The Chi Machine. The description that follows is from Lighten Up Wellness, a local holistic and alternative health store here in Fort Wayne.
Soooo many ways to interperate this one....this is the season to celebrate!!
i see circles....lots and lots of circles this year....
This history figured into the 20088 presidential campaign in a small way: One of the internet hoax letters complaining about Barack Obama claimed that the U.S. entered World War II against Germany although the Germans had not fired a single round against the U.S. The 115 dead from the crew of 160 aboard the James testify to the inaccuracy of that claim, wholly apart from the treaty of mutual defense Germany and Japan were parties to, whichencouraged Germany to declare war upon any nation that went to war with Japan. After the U.S. declaration of war on Japan, Germany declared war on the U.S., creating a state of war with Germany.
I’ve written adult novels, though they haven’t been published. I also write nonfiction novels in the course of my wedding planning career. But I got into reading YA novels a few years ago, and once my daughter was born six years ago, I decided that I wanted to write books that she could ultimately read. Thus, I started the Daughters of Saraqael trilogy.
We vote, and soon with indelible ink, and we live with the outcome. Thus far, that has been the case. There are countries that are much older than our 50 years that have failed this democratic test.
I love you seems to be a “Hallmark” term.
Ok. This won’t take long. The Magic are without their only defensive presence in Dwight Howard. Coach Van Gundy has probably already boxed up his office in his mind, and the Pacers are playing some of the best basketball in the NBA right now. Just because a dead clock is right twice a day and that the Magic tend to heat up from the outside every few games, I give the Magic one game. Other than that, I think they have already set up their summer vacation plans.
There are three principal purposes for marriage arising out of this: the procreation of children, companionship, and sexual union. Marriage is a covenant before God which Jesus confirms with the phrase ‘God hath joined together’ (Mt 19:6). When that marriage is royal, the joining is all the more important because in its symbolism it embodies something of the hopes of the nation. We do not care much for our drab politicians and we care even less for our pompous prelates. But our Monarch is loved, admired and respected the world over: the institution is worthy of our support and loyalty. One perceives in Prince William an understanding of and commitment to his duty, but it is increasingly apparent that he also possesses something of the common, modernising and even rebellious touch of his mother: he is immanent and tangible, if a little unknowable.
1/2 cup of water with 2 tbs of instant dashi*
I chopped up a tomato
Holly Reiger - guitars
Can't wait to try the Nobu ephemeral restaurant at the Hotel Ritz opening for one month only on October 11th!
I learned I can type off the top of my head and still send words flying out of my fingers over 100 wpm. When I say they’re on fire, that’s pretty close. I learned I can type over 3000 words in an hour. That might seem like a modest 50ish wpm, but keeping it up for an hour or more is daunting.
But Martha has taken up a spiritual sword, and challenging the spiritual good, making it accessible and perhaps whispering something is rotten in the religious kingdom of Norway.
Happy Beading!
Regular Season
Secrets to Seducing a Scot is the first book of the series Highland Knaves by Michele Marcos and it is thrilling while being seducing with the characters.
I sigh and try to look dignified leading Amber into the room.
To search for my baby brother,
Bake at 325°F for one hour then reduce heat and bake at 300°F for an additional 30 minutes until the center is just set.
At about this time a gentleman across the aisle addressed me. “Please forgive the delay, we’re almost around the bottleneck.” As the conversation evolved I learned he was a lawyer that never outgrew his boyhood fascination with cowboys. His eyes bulged upon hearing I had lived in Texas. “You know Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid were killed here in Bolivia while robbing the railroad companies.” I did know that, but the modern chaos of La Paz suddenly made it hard to imagine two American outlaws riding off in the sunset, sombreros tipped to the left. “If you catch your train south, you’ll see the wide open land they used to call home.”
This beautiful little shell became a sort of analogy of parenting, relationships to others, to one’s self.
5nos Dry red chillies
“Junsu ah, for this part you’ll have your own scene.” our manager said.
For non-profits, social media can mean the life or death of a campaign. Here are a few tips, to turn a blah social media campaign into a great one.
Dorothy. Wear red shoes and the nickname is inevitable. But that aside, isn’t there a magical feeling of wonder that comes when slipping on a pair of your very own pair of ruby slippers?
Now that dinner is over, I think I will get a little sleep. But, wait they have movies. Tons of movies. I haven’t seen that or that or that. Damn. I need to get some sleep, but I could also catch up on all the movies I have missed in the last 5 years. Ok, one movie, then I will see how I feel.
d. Not to be spoken of
Now, I realize that this transition in thought is nothing novel … mind-blowing … or groundbreaking. There have been many before me that have given credence to positive thinking and the impact it can have on one’s approach to life.
That day, however, other plans interfered with them walking with me.
Lastly I have these sweet little vintage tattoo inspired LOVE charms. Freaking cute, eh?
D. required California to enter the Union as a slave state.
I’ve been e-mailing a Covenant of the Goddess officer, and just a few hours ago I received a response back from her, stating, “The Covenant doesn’t train for clergy. We trust that the coven belonging to the Covenant will train but to be honest, I find that most of the training is one person who is not and has never been clergy, training someone else. The training is usually spotty and frankly most professionally trained clergy in the larger religions don’t really recognize these credentials.” Which, you know, seeing as this is a spread out religion with no central bureacracy, so to speak, legitimacy is extremely hard to establish. Going through the Unitarian Universalist Church would basically be the best option, but to be endorsed, you have to be a UU and be involved in the congregation, of course. So, you know, crap! Plus, I’m not quite sure what it is about UU, but I just don’t particularly like it.
The goal, I believe, is to minimize race as a descriptor in any way. If people were all enlightened beings, words would just go back to being words. Chink would just be a dent or blemish. Fag would just be an English word for cigarette.
My list of life’s certainties yesterday was found to be incomplete. Today sees that rectified with Arsène due before the Uefa beaks for his observations following the second leg victory over AC Milan. Little doubt that the Frenchman will be banned, he always is when it comes to the European kangaroo court.
G) Consumer communications efforts are very campaign focused. Perhaps because:
Immigration is a double-edged sword – it can build a great and powerful nation like the United States, but can also plant the seeds of its eventual downfall too as in the case of the Western Roman empire.
I'm cured and my heart
My favourite artist ever is Wassily Kandinsky. I love his work so much and immediately knew he would be my "inspired by". Some of his work is so detailed that there was no way I could do it on my nails. But Farbstudie Quadrate was doable.
Sometimes it seems I sabotage myself....
not have to leave.
This blog will now just be for family stuff.
At first glance, these words seem harsh – as if Jesus is pushing His mother away. Imagine a mother calling her 14-year-old son to the dinner table for supper, and the son responding by saying, “Woman, what do you have to do with me? My hour has not yet come!” To our modern ears, these words sound more like those of a rebellious teenager than of the holy Son of God!
2) Not annoy me by being badly written, badly researched, ill thought through (or not thought through at all), unoriginal and stereotyped characters, an obvious rip off of another book.
Hi there blog friends, I am hoping your weekend is sailing along beautifully. I have had a little chance this morning to finish off another set of cards featuring those beautiful stamps mentioned in my last post.
Probably because it’s so embarrassing.
Stone masonry, even using the rustic standards of the NPS, was a challenging job... At the quarry, enrollees would use picks, chains and winches (but no explosives) to break off and select just the right size boulders... Once the rocks made their way to the job site, they would be individually placed on benches at single workstations. Dozens of CCC boys spent many hours standing at the benches and shaping quartzite blocks using a hammer and chisel. Their work required long hours of standing, sweating and sculpting flat surfaces so the stone could be dropped into a prearranged yet natural-looking slot in the building wall...
I actually did almost nothing to the inside other than layering some of the DPs. That Eiffel Tower is part of the DP design. The only thing I did was add a couple of stamped images . . . including a fabulous sentiment quote by author and humorist, the late Erma Bombeck. Here's a close-up . . .
Written & Directed by Ti West
A personal note: mr felix was instrumental in encouraging kabuki to relocate to palm springs. I am healthier, happier, and more optomistic about my future than I have been in years. I blame felix entirely for this. So won't you stop by his little corner of the interspace and wish him many happy returns on the day. kabuki thanks you immensely. http://felixinhollywood.blogspot.com/
Do please bear with me and hopefully things will return to normal in the not too distant future. I live in hope - you may as well join me!
Hope everyone has a blessed Sunday.
1. Godfather Part II
We met some ... interesting... Italians, then went out with a new friend. It was a crazy night that produced many funny stories, that aren't necessarily blog appropriate ;)
Assorted Tibet Silver Charms
So once again = Zero points + 10 points for the puppy loving = 10 points
But on a brighter note… humm there is no brighter note as the sun has gone down
It would seem Freddy and I broke the ice of this fight and it was starting to melt away. This made me happy. It was bad enough trying to let go of Cutie for the millionth time, I couldn’t afford to lose someone else so close to me.
“And what am I supposed to do in the meantime?” he asked.
The idea that pubs close because they were badly run ignores the wider picture
Brouwerij Huyghe Delirium Nocturnum
Taschen’s lavish three-volume set Inez van Lamsweerde Vinoodh Matadin: Pretty Much Everything is not a complete collection of the fashion photographers’ vast work, but it does gives the reader a sense of their creative breadth: slick, sexy, even avant-garde. In an accompanying essay on portraiture throughout the ages, William Blake is quoted and the ancient marble faces of the Cyclades are name checked, but don’t let that make you think this is a purely intellectual exercise. Van Lamsweerde and Matadin are smart but also visceral, so much so that they can get away with celebrity portraiture – say, of a smoke-enrapt Clint Eastwood – that often obscures the famous visages they are hired to capture. They take this even further with a series of graphic collages based on their photographs of Eastwood, Bill Murray, Scarlett Johansson and other A-listers. It is a testament to their demand as artists that they can pull this off. But wait, aren’t they supposed to be fashion photographers?
Give. Give hilariously. Give freely. Prepare how you will give now. This is the only way you become a Burner, and not just a poser. That may be true for Burning Man, but it is true for the Kingdom of God too.
Trust me when I say to all of you who entered , your creations were extremelly wonderful!
(a) This mixes the ingredients.
Driftin' on the mindless sea
13 - Drum Solo
If I hadn’t applied for a fucking passport before I lost my wallet, I think I would still not be able to establish my identity. It’s fucking ridiculous, and the asshole beauracrats all use September 11th as an excuse which fucking disgusts me.
So my question is, do you have the same problem? Are there certain books, that you just can't read because of your internal editor? Have you figured out how to shut it off?
The last sight I have of Livia is her crying and saying she didn’t want to go!
Remove the stew from the oven and arrange the biscuits on top. Brush on the egg mixture and return to the oven to bake for 20-30 minutes until the biscuits are brown and the stew is bubbly.
Finally Mom to Bed by 8, the Iowa-Mom wants you to enjoy your stylish night out and is bringing a $50 Visa Gift Card to the What A Woman Wants party for you to do just that.
Inside every synth you'll find a collection of boxes that either create raw sound or shape it in some way. Some boxes work with sound directly. Some boxes control what other boxes do.
Worse, the yonanas site was not designed for a mobile phone screen. The web site is the same whether you’re visiting from your computer or your phone. Which made it almost impossible to experience the site properly with a mobile device. So if the advertiser’s intent was to get people to buy a yonanas machine in the store, I’d say they missed an opportunity.
Overlooking
We have reached this point through the gradual, drip, drip, drip erosion of our culture and or national self esteem. In many ways Briton has come to resemble the brave soldier who would once have taken on and bettered any foe, but who now submits, childlike, to his hectoring wife, because after years of nagging, she has broken his spirit.
Ring-around-the-rosy
Sink your teeth into hearty whole grains, including whole-wheat bread and fortified whole-grain breakfast cereals, for a hair-healthy dose of zinc, iron, and B vitamins.
These rats are the largest breed of rats in the world. Excluding that guy Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, (or as Katie Couric calls him, “Dinnerjacket”) from Iran.
Entire families, couples, mothers and daughters and girlfriends . . . . . . Oh MY!
But it's this portrait that keeps drawing me back. It's always so interesting to me to see what children see when they look at people on a daily basis. What is it that they remember and that sticks out to them?
Under the flap of Bigsby is two new sides,
sprinkling each of cloves, black pepper
But does he listen ?
He cared about teaching us to love each other, regardless of our differences. For us to do less, by choosing to divide ourselves along some esoteric lines of racial, religious, ethnic, cultural, gender or other attitudes, only exhibits how less we are than in the teachings of Jesus.
But despite these obstacles, I had my groupie crush, an object of desire. Had I been a decade younger and he’d been the Teen Beat magazine type, his poster would have been all over my walls. And I was sure we were destined to be together.
And then, all of a sudden Mike disappears.
enjoy more of Fiona’s work in her new book “The Most Beautiful Thing”
Ich kann mich in Eure Lage hineinstellen und Ihr sollt euch nicht von einigen Minute absparen um mir zu schicken denn es ist wirklich nicht notwendig.
As a parent, I’m concerned, and not just for my own children. I’m acutely aware that my boys need time to run around and explore. But I also know that all children need opportunities for physical play, and that kid-structured playtime can improve academic learning and social skills. I know that boys, especially, have a competitive, aggressive streak that needs to find a safe outlet, and that learning to manage that streak is an important part of the trek to manhood.
Invitations: We passed out pillow shaped invitations that said to wear pajamas, bring a blanket, and a stuffed friend.
I love the contrast.
Me: Yes. And the flora.
'Although this is a manual job, some computer skills would be an advantage' - we only want to pay manual labour rates for what is a largely IT job.
I was 7-years old when a friend of my parents' had taken my sister and I to see "The Mask."
I recall her going to the meeting and coming back pretty mad. She also didn’t like what he had to say about the grade and me. She was not that upset with me, but upset with him. I pretty much hated going to Art that whole year and he certainly helped make that one of the worst years of school for me. He continued to single me out with criticism and bad grades. I recall on the last day of the year, my mom picked me up from school and took me to a restaurant for ice cream. When we got there, there was the Art teacher, sitting in a booth right across from us and eating. I recall him staring at me and my mother. We stared back. It was very eerie, like each one was waiting for the other to make some aggressive move. Nothing happened, of course, and we moved to Virginia about a month later.
I think I paid around $31 for two games and shipping. Great deal, yes? Plus, the games are educational and fun, which makes it an even better deal in my humble opinion.
“Made In Britain” (a book by Evan Davis to accompany his BBC 2 series to be shown in June 2011) supports the findings of this ipeg study. Evan Davis explains that traditional manufacturing was dispersed geographically mainly due to natural resources – i.e. the concentration of steel works in Wales due to the availability of pig iron and coal – but now with the rise of the knowledge industries, and the greater need for face-to-face contact, people cluster in particular regions which has lead to the regional imbalances we see today.
On the business side, beer management remains predominantly male, though there have been changes there, too, says Irene Firmat, founder and CEO of Full Sail Brewing Co. in Hood River, Ore.”
I had been raised with a little bit of “religion”–attended church nearly every week, growing up…however, it didn’t amount to much more than empty ritual, for me–devoid of any real meaning or relevance. It neither added nor subtracted from my life in any way–just sort of a “zero sum” thing that we did for an hour on Sunday, before going back to “real life” the rest of the week.
What English misses in detail, and what would have led me to eat my full dose of crow was the impact that all of this had on ordinary/uninvolved New Yorkers. The crime was outrageous, but it is outrageous today, too, in a place like Over-the-Rhine. Gang-bangers shooting druggies is violent struggle (with not exactly noble purposes), but it ever-so-rarely touches the pharmacist who lives with her family in say, Loveland. These individuals are largely absent from “The Savage City.” I can only surmise that while there were incidents of random robberies, crimes, and murders, the ordinary New Yorker was more often harmed by the fact that the country’s perception of the city went straight to hell and as we know all too well in Cincinnati, perception can cripple a city.
Think about it. Nick Lowles is demanding that the Government classify the EDL as an ‘extremist group’. Let’s be clear here. A Communist is informing the Government about another group’s extremism. Yet Lowles is himself a Communist subversive - almost by definition.
One action in particular is what I like to call giving “just because” flowers. There should be sporadic, random days in the life of a husband when he brings flowers home to his wife and when she asks, “What’s the occasion?”, he will be able to say, “Just because.” On these occasions, “just because” will be translated by your wife as “just because I love you”. I think the only way you can ruin this is if you ask for something right after you give her the flowers. Then “just because” will be translated, “just because I wanted to butter you up”. So, with that small warning, plan to give your wife some “just because flowers” soon, but don’t do it just because I told you to.
THANK YOU is not even enough for me to say for those who will help in my cause!!! -- and PLEASE if you can pass the word along on your blogs, it would be great! -- i'll even start doing some give-aways for incentive - and we have ALL the way till May 6, 2012 to make our goal!!!! -- i'll be re-posting to remind **yes i will be annoying, but it's something i'm passionate about**
Here in Oregon's Willamette Valley, we don't get a lot of snow. Ok, hardly any at all, ever. Maybe a dust every couple of years. We have mountains on either side of us, with lots of snow there ! Mostly I love to look at it from a long (long long) distance away. After living 9 years in Minnesota, and 3 years in Ohio I have found snow is always better seen than driven upon.
Brains. Brawny. Stealth. They are now complete. AND… Joseon F4 Rangers COMBINE!
Rosemary here and I do enjoy nature - I love that where I live allows me to enjoy distinct seasons. Right now the air is still fairly crisp and cool but there is a little hint of something warmer coming, a fragrance of flowers starting to bloom, trees to bud, and all moving toward springtime. I have one hydrangea bush in my front yard but I love the blossoms, My project reminds me of the blossoms.
Sugar Ray and Anna
"Our interests and energies are focussed on the boy, and not traffic patterns."
winter clothing for them. Most of them were 70% off! Gloves were .44c
He nodded. “I’ll see you at ten till.”
8. The Munster’s House on Colonial Street was originally built for the 1946 production, So Goes My Love.
I need your thoughts and feedback...I need your help to sell my home.
7.) Said PC begins quoting Clint Eastwood movies.
Wow – this album, Dorwytch, was a real case of love at first byte. It turned up on end-of-year lists at Collapse Board and The Quietus, but I never seemed to have enough money in my pocket to take it home until this month, though I had it on frequent rotation at Spotify. Think of folk and you think of knitwear and frump and inoffensive upper-middle-class twits with awful hair, but this is no such thing. Alexander Tucker makes music that feels like it’s been pulled from some other era when things were newer and a lot more dangerous – but more innocent, too. It’s really pretty and has cellos in it.
In a frantic attempt to claw back lost ground he says that she's only there because Maurice asked for her. This response is met with jeers of disbelief.
The Social Secretary and K happened to be driving nearby when they caught a glimpse of flashing blue lights, and stopped off to see the fun...the fun being firemen in rubber boots. (What is it with women and firemen? Why not women and town planners? What have firemen got that town planners haven't? Do firemen use Article 4 Directions and Section 106 Agreements? Do they have Rotring Rapidographs in all sizes from 0.1 to 0.8 and several seductive shades of black and burgundy? Can they quote the Use Classes Order or operate a Planimeter? Have they got felt tips? I don't think so).
I am TRYing, but I still don’t understand the fascination with pastels. They are pretty much blunt edged, they get all smeary into other colors.. every time I use them, I feel like I’ve been handed a box of crayons. Actually, crayons are sharper. They come WITH a sharpener built-in. And I once made this totally badass drawing of a red bar candle with nothing but red crayon (yep, for the children’s menus), a ballpoint pen and a sharpie (and yep, I was totally doing that sketch at work).
With much disappointment he went to the screen
Not having a place to call home, and a neighbourhood to discover as “my own” is part of why I am feeling a bit disjointed. I know this will all ease up shortly, and I can’t wait till it does because I can see how amazing it can be here. I even went the other day to check out an apartment in Oval area, but it didn’t meet my standards for coziness and cleanliness, and although the area was cute the building was run down and there weren’t many pubs/restaurants/shops nearby. I checked it out because it was close to a park, which is something I would really like to have, but I am thinking not being close to a park would be ok if I have friends and lots of other things to see/do (like a canal instead!). So after that experience, and reflecting on how exhausting house hunting is and that it can be a case of “which comes first, the chicken or the egg”, I have decided that for now, because I have some great friends who have allowed me to stay with them for the first few weeks, I will concentrate on finding a job. Once that gets settled/moves forward I can think a bit more clearly about a home. That will also allow me some time to go wandering through the different neighbourhoods (those that are in my price range anyway) to discover where I want to live.
“I grew up in a secular household,” she said, “and was baptized and made my communion only because of my grandmother who was very religious.”
When we the people elected President Obama in mass we voted for change! Now, the old order has fought tooth and nail to impede the change we the people desire. There are some of us who after four years may be disappointed and disillusioned; Don't BE!
Gisborne District Council acting chief executive Nedine Thatcher-Swann said at that time –
- Japanese soldiers defecated and urinated next to the wounded in field hospitals
share with us what your goal is... how is it going and should you re-evaluate it.
and youth especially are now under the severe influence of spirits
As someone who likes everything just so before inviting people in, it’s been a humbling experience for me. Everyone wants to see the fixer upper in its “before” state. Oh my!
But Najib must be mindful of conservatives in his party who are wary that his moves to relax tough security laws and push limited election reforms could threaten their 55-year hold on power.
We told yesterday how the EDL, the group behind Saturday’s Luton march, wants to be taken seriously, like the British National Party, by fielding candidates in local and general elections.
Naturally, the hotel entertainment was of a certain type, often geared toward children, clowns and magicians and brass bands. The saloons, however, were a different breed of animal. First clustered around an area called the Gut, and later on a strip named after the Manhattan street it most resembled, the Bowery, Coney Island’s saloon scene was just what you would expect in that time and place.
"Time to move on," I thought as I discarded the overgrown stems and outer shells into the trash bin.
Badtime Bedtime Storybook art Leo Baxendale
URGENT – DEADLINE MAY 17!
We usually feel nothing at the time.
Let me just start by saying that I LOVE being your mom. It’s the best thing in the world. That being said, there are small downsides to everything. Even the most wonderful things in the world… this post is about one of the few downsides to being a mom.
Those of us who survived the regimented rows in high school classrooms with bells and detention and following the very undemocratic rules laid down by authoritarian adults are doing our best to un-do the damage done by the system. I’ll wager that most of the teachers and administrators meant well. They were just doing their job to put food on their family, as Bush 2 said (“I know how hard it is for you to put food on your family.”—Greater Nashua, N.H., Chamber of Commerce, Jan. 27, 2000). Whatever. Pink Floyd immortalized our collective experience of school in “The Wall.” If you sense rancor in my tone, you got it right.
Gather supplies inspired by that color palette.
Here's a quick look at some of the pieces that will be listed in the next couple of days :)
In our Colour Challenge
Though she has a lover!
Pour 1/2 cup of broth over the top of your roasts and cover the pan with foil. Bake for 30 minutes and remove the foil. Add half of the remaining broth. Bake for another 30 minutes, basting occasionally. Remove the pan from the oven and flip the loaves over. (I usually need to use two spatulas together to do this without tearing the roasts.) Pour the remaining broth over the loaves and bake for 30 more minutes, basting often.
Without going into too much detail, these notes are organised into scales using various combinations of the twelve notes. The standard DoReMi scale uses eight notes, while the blues can be played using a mere five notes. Play a run of single notes and you have a melody, add other notes to be played and sung at the same time and you have harmony (or discord- depending on the choice of note)
My Bourbon Relay Race teammates agreed as we told stories and ate the night away. The toasted buttered panko crumbs made it. Between a pan of this, a pan of veggie lasagna and a pot of BBQ turkey for sliders, pumpkin spice cookies and 4 bottles of wine – it was a helluva meal.
Peach and Green Bazzill
I will sing praise to your name,
So...I am going to pay it forward. I'm not sure how yet, but I'm working on it. We did adopt a family through our Church and have bought several Angel Tree gifts. But I want to do more. What are you doing this year in the name of the Christmas Spirit?
If you would like to make these, and don't have a sewing machine, using tacky glue or fabric glue should do the trick as well.
Cream butter and sugar until light and fluffy. Add eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition.
spring rain —
3 ounces all-purpose flour (about 2/3 cup)
In recent weeks some of the kids have begun to moan at me regarding the building and the restrictions associated with it. To that end they are testing other adults in the club, and on occasion getting the kind of ‘rise’ they were intent on provoking – mild annoyance, value judgments and statements – a ‘grumpy grown up’ response to play with and perhaps push further. Hence it was suggested that I take them up the road to Knottwood Park at least once a week to ‘relieve some of the tension’.
3. They think they've drawn up the point structure to benefit business travelers. So what? Leisure travelers fail to recognize this: if people didn't travel for business, air travel as you know it would not exist. Period. So spare them your resentment. Businesspeople, especially those who frequently have to pay through the nose for short-notice fares, subsidize that $89 seat you bought to Las Vegas. And while you associate the airport with fun places like Sin City, they associate it with yet another week of being away from their family while they visit a construction site in Birmingham, AL. They are the only reason there are so many flights available at those fares. Forgive Southwest if they're trying to build loyalty with those who spend the most.
So fingers crossed Bagpiper gets on bored with this, because help around the house once a month would be a huge blessing.
Jatt: Oh. Right! Well, I mean there was this one misunderstanding with my dual citizenship, but that’s a reasonable accident when you think about it.
1 ¼ cups fresh orange juice preferred or Tropicana Orange Juice
I would say to my housemates that I would go down to the creek to meditate but I really didn’t know what that meant. I heard of meditation as spoke about within the same sentence as Transcendental. But never engaging in the practice, reading about it or knowing anyone who meditated regularly, I really didn’t know what I was going to do once I got down to the creak to sit a while.
Here now are five of the best Australian shows from 2010.
" I really like you not because of who you are, but because of who I am when I am with you." - Anonymous
-If you and your loved one are wine fans, take a tour of a local winery. Many offer tours and tastings for free and throw in advice as well.
I have chosen to DO.
Yep, it's been over 2 weeks since my last post. Looks like I've really got this new blog off to a great start, huh? Here's what I have found out during that 2-week period...FOOD BLOGGING IS HARD! Imagine that phrase being said in a high-pitched, sing-songy, whine (and not the good, makes you a little giggly kind, either).
On the other hand, you have to be careful that your location mentions aren’t so specific that only people in that city will get the reference.
One of the things Kyle had to bring for his first week of first grade was "his favorite book." They used it throughout the week to do different activities. The book Kyle chose was Chester's Masterpiece (linked to my original review). He did indeed read it a lot this summer, and it grew on me as well. I love the idea of Chester, but I don't find him as funny as my children do. However, this story is very clever, and I love how Melanie Watt includes the elements of writing a story in it.
His presentation was so moving and so influential to the kids he was addressing, ImageMasters Productions of Atlanta made a double-Emmy-winning documentary filmed on location in Georgia high-school auditoriums and from inside Chris’s prison cell. No money was made by anyone on the film, but it is a source of comfort to Chris that the film is still being used today in rehab programs, courts and educational venues.
Suddenly a huge burst of water erupts about 15 metres away and, seconds later, a gigantic blue tail sweeps up into the air and crashes down upon the surface.
Brandon Vazquez
Having just enjoyed the fist-sized apple cider doughnuts with maple whipped cream at Hearth (hurt me), I was thinking that fried dough with some form of creamy accompaniment just might be the most amazing thing in the world. Or at least one of them.
First up: a note about how I felt early on. Physically I felt good to great. Breathing was never an issue (unless you are sub-4 hours breathing is not the issue, legs/pain are). No odd pains, no first mile (or two) of agony. About mile 5-6 my left quad kind of made some noise. This is the one that cramped after my 20(.7) longest run in training. It had hurt for a week after that, but not on my 13.1 or 8 the following weekends. I do remember thinking “Oh God, if it’s making noises now how is it going to be in 10 miles or more?”. But I found that if I ran in the center of the road when I could w/the left leg on the “uphill” part it hurt less. So I did that a lot. Eventually it went away or I forgot about it.
Pretty good punch to it, about like an imperial pale should be, although it has a pretty harsh bitter aftertaste. I don't know, seems kind of meh overall, although that may be because it's a pretty bland style to take imperial. It should be closer to an IPA, but it just, isn't.
the last snow pile
Tottenham Hotspur - £57,380,883
If I had a time machine, I’d be pretty rich.
Excuse me a minute while I clear the cobwebs in here.
Any questions please send me a message and i will do my best to help you out.
I always try to do a flower tutorial for each Swirlydoos kit that comes out, and with the debut of the yet to be seen August kit, here is the new flower tutorial. Totally inspired by Prima's Camelot flowers, I developed these using 2 simple punches. 2 sizes of the Retro Punch. Hope you enjoy making these as I had. They are simple.
…will tell you we don’t use them enough! They really do love to use them and see them as a great tool that can be used in many different ways. I am pleased that I have included them in on the blogging process, as this has sort of become a rite of passage for kids. “Yeah, I’ve been a blogger, have you?” Not only is it important for me to blog about this experience, but I think it is crucial for kids to really be a part of this project and its’ successes and challenges.
I love this pic with Rook and Lola, they love her so much and are finding she was easier to hold when she only weighed 8 lbs and slept the entire time.
We didn't get to the Bronx, but Battery Park, yes - on our last full day in New York, passing through on route to the Staten Island Ferry for a sail-by sighting of the Statue of Liberty.
It leaves our home so lonely and drear,
Well, the delta is under the tidal influences of the sea. As a result it so happens that some of the small islands get completely flooded during high tide. All the land goes under water. And the tigers in these islands have to stay afloat for that entire time, quite a difficult feat. Moreover there is always a tough competition for food. There are deer and monkeys in these forests, which are their primary food. But sometimes the tigers enter the surrounding villages in search of food and take away domestic cows and goats.
their challenge card?
The municipality had finally returned to finish a river-stabilizing job that was started nine months ago. I was pleased to see them return but horrified when the bucket/arm of the excavator extinguished the power. Just before the driver swiped the line a second time, the other workers and I caught his attention! Lovely. I had to laugh at the irony! I approached the men and stated my urgent need to finish some internet work. With a grand smile, I rode shotgun to town in a giant bright-yellow dump truck!!!
We’ve had some great instructions over the weeks. Lets use the rhyme to chose one. Maybe gather up all the ones you haven’t done, the ones that have worried you. Now say the rhyme with those and the one that lands on Mo is the one your doing.
One time we were locking up a hold up man and having a conversation about how they target their victims. I was saying they pick easy ones, another guy was saying they preferred easy ones but would take anybody.
Last night, I stayed up too late recording that podcast thing- I was asked to fill in again. I'd like to say I'm honored to be asked to sit in when one of the 3 guys can't make it, but I'm thinking it's more of a convenience things since they are sitting in the basement of my house. I'm half kidding- I know Jeff enjoys my being there and I think Dave appreciates what I bring to the conversation and I know I have fun sitting and talking to them for an hour.
Kidz Bop is an interesting entity. For those of you who do not have young children, it is a whole series of CDs that include the most modern and successful pop songs but sung by pre-teens and with toned down language. Many times, I actually prefer the Kidz Bop recordings to the originals. The sweet singers actually have good talent, and the recordings possess an innocence that is missing in music on the radio today.
so ok as the first part of my tittle says, i’m going to Paris again this year xDDD, but this time it’s main Paris, no Disneyland anymore xDDD
When I met Steve things were different. I knew he was a good man and he treated me well. I was in a time in my life where I felt like I was ready to get married. It was a box to check off on my life's 'to do' list. I don't believe in soul mates and knew that with dedication and hard work that I could make my marriage to any man work.
Author: Marisa Mills
“If Candlemas be dull and cool
Laos has handed over to Chinese police a drug lord suspected of masterminding the execution-like killing of 13 Chinese seamen last October on the Mekong River. Naw Kham, seen, right, in transit at Vientiane airport, is a Burmese in his 40s and said to lead a heavily armed drugs trafficking gang. He was arrested on April 25, assumedly in Laos, and has been flown to Beijing.
I'm not sure why but the general reaction upon hearing that my wedding dress doesn't reach the floor (and thus lacks any sort of train) is a mix of surprise and shock ... followed by speechlessness.
I'm sick and tired of this notion that there is a singular BIG IDEA out there....Big ideas take too much time to find and we don't have the time to find 'em. From what I've read, the logic of "small idea" thinking goes like this: Since the consumer is now "in control" we can no longer force-feed her messages. Instead we have to be everywhere she is on the web with an "engaging conversation," not a sales message.
Here's Jacob with beads on his head in Big Lots.
First Action Interview Pilot enhances information exchange between applicant and examiner and promotes early resolution of outstanding issues
– NYC “White Shirt” Cop Supervisors Help Arrest Wall Street Protesters
I mentioned a giveaway recently. This is a very exciting one. I have joined forces with my main supplier of silver clay and the woman who taught me how to make things from it, the lovely Juliet of Spoilt Rotten Beads.
Relationships fall apart out of selfishness and both parties need to share the blame. Men do have feelings and women are taught to take them for granted or completely ignore them. Women are taught to demand affection, demand love, demand passion but never taught to extend that to the men in their lives. People tend to underestimate the value of good communication. A relationship with open and honest communication is a relationship that will weather the test of time and emerge stronger. Ironically, in that OWN series, the marriages that survived many years after the indiscretions were the ones that took advantage of counseling and engaged in honest self-reflection and honest communication with their partners and themselves. It is always refreshing to hear the men, in their own words, admit to their role and what they truly needed from the women in their lives. It has becomes very predictible that the women’s responses to the men are “I did not know.” Those responses are from assumptions that men bounce back quicker and resolve difficult emotions almost immediately so they do not need any extra love or attention. They are perfectly fine and dandy. Think again ladies! They are in great inner turmoil.
Davis: – and that's apocalypse properly understood, its real, Biblical meaning. It’s precisely this idea of an unrevealed, secret history of the world that will become luminously clear in the last hour, and will rewrite history from the standpoint of the people who had previously been history’s victims. I would say that, as somebody who’s ultimately an old-fashioned socialist, or rationalist, with an almost excessive faith in science – you know, I tremble when I write this stuff. I take no joy in writing a book about car bombs, but it just struck me that here was this technology nobody had written about on its own terms, yet it had become horribly successful. It’s a lot easier for me to cope with hypochondria about avian flu – having written a book about it – than if I hadn’t written about it. Let’s put it that way. I feel the same way about the future of my children.
The brilliance of this film comes from the ‘fish out of water’ convention – or in this case, god out of Asgard. Chris Hemsworth as Thor is single-minded, impulsive, and stentorian. When Odin played by Anthony Hopkins (Legends of the Fall) banishes Thor from the dead-serious halls of Asgard, the bearded and be-muscled god of thunder is plunked into the desserts of New Mexico.
Zombies are obviously keeping a close eye on current affairs as well as the recent glut of undead films, because those pesky brain scoffers have decided that violence is going to get them nowhere, and are trying to bring about the apocalypse through business…
Right after I find that little piece of plastic.
We left the crowded tent to catch some air (read: Monkey got his cigar on) and the remaining shafts of sunlight for the day. We estimated the crowd count totals: 800? 1,000 people? A waiter handed me a small cup of butternut squash bisque and I savored every creamy drop. There was a photo booth, stocked with period costumes and wigs for silly people have record of themselves being silly. The staff were putting out space heaters around the tables where every third guest was smoking a cigar. Replenished, we headed back in to brave the longest line: pulled pork with apple-herbed coleslaw. People were queued up from the front of the tent to the back. We were feeling patient, so found the tail-end and stood. After finally making our way to the table, we enjoyed our servings. The pork was nice, but lacking in smoke flavor (however, there were smoked pig heads adjacently displayed — bait and switch?). Perhaps because of the large crowd, they weren't able to prepare for the large quantities with a smoker the way they did last year and went for oven roasting instead. Still tasty, and the slaw was a perfect accompaniment.
09-14 Mansfield, MA – Comcast Center #
I’m So Thankful – Reigning Sound
Where life was warm and sunny and I was well-content.
Attempting to sooth the electorate's concern over the third world masses engulfing our boarders with a few half hearted lies, appears to be the latest wheeze plucked from the NuLabour lexicon of spin and deception, as they seem to be all at it.
Never Experience Facial Flushing Again!
Some anti-fascists have been jailed for an attack on some fash attending a Blood and Honour gig. It’s really important that we make sure that they aren’t left feeling isolated while inside. If you need advice on sending letters to prisoners, check out “Writing to Prisoners” in the resources section of the blog. Details are as follows:
Overcoming coverage obstacles
The problem with doing that is that you have to live up to your lies and in the majority of cases, you will get caught out
He has imaginary friends.
21. Aztec Camera - Down The Dip
For a moment I was struck speechless by the sheer ballsiness of a guy who assumed everyone was as dishonest as himself. Then I shook my head and grinned an evil grin.
I've been meaning to try a paper rosette craft for a while. I first saw
The labourer had been living in Glasgow for the past five years. Police said that there was no apparent motive for the attack at the moment.
The Limelights are beautiful for sure, just not my favorite hydrangea:
SCHLESSINGER: My dear, my dear --
Even before Japan started its militaristic expansion, many Japanese became involved in espionage, sabotage, or fifth columnist (clandestine) activities.
Truth Storm is a new organization, beginning online. I am currently recruiting staff (moderators and admins) to help me keep the forum under control, post information, and grow membership. Considering the task is no easy one, only the serious minded need apply. The forums were just launched, so are still quite empty. In the beginning the position is more like a spare time kind of thing. But once membership reaches a certain number, you will have the ability to take it on as a paid, full-time position.
expert but I’ve drunk my fair share of it (almost always responsibly) and I know what I like. I’ve been very fortunate to have, at times some amazingly fine wines. When my father passed away my brothers and I split his wine collection and since then we have opened a bottle for when we’re together or for special occasions. These are the kind of wines where you understand what sommeliers mean when they talk about notes of leather, red currant, cinnamon etc. Wines you savor.
Is what I want too much to ask for?
I still enjoy Commando today, even amongst all the fabulous publications I’m privileged to read as part of my job. It just goes to prove that Commando’s brand of action and adventure resonates across ages.
I'm crazy for how the Art Center pairs with the window. It's almost as if I planned it!?! Using fabric glue, I trimmed the drapes in perfectly-coordinated grosgrain ribbon. The drapes aren't as sheer as they appear, it's just difficult to get a good picture of a West-facing window when it's actually light enough to see it.
Please note that the tutorials are not currently compatible with Arduino IDE v1.0. Please continue to use v22 or v23 until further notice.
Love wins. Love always wins.
If Blair cannot back up his claims he himself should be charged with obstruction of justice and criminal breach of trust. A Chief of Police cannot just make up stuff and get away with it.
Love you, Robin. That was epic. Where we going next?
I chose simple silver pulls for the bottom three drawers and crystal knobs for the top. This was more out of necessity than design. The top drawer's drill holes are closer together than the other drawers.
What’s going on now is that my wedding is just over three months away, and I am not as skinny as I’d like to be. I feel loose everywhere, with a body that’s…undisciplined. Generally I’ve been feeling overwhelmed and under-prepared for life in the last three months, and this means that my ability to make healthy meals at home has slipped, and I’ve been relying on frozen foods a lot. My psychological reserves are way down, and I can’t resist comfort foods, I can’t take the energy to count calories, I can’t make myself do much of anything that my mind is resisting.
What left me thinking however was one scene in the play, when a buffalo falls sick and dies. The whole act by all means was underplayed. There was no drama or lot of crying involved but I observed that suddenly Ojas’s mood has kind of changed. He has quietened and was looking really sad. I asked him what happened and could see one small teardrop in the corner of his eye and with a very feeble voice he asked me “Mumma why she died”. It made me still for a moment, my heart alternating between pacing and stopping that only a mother can understand… that did my not even 4 yr old understood death? Did he realise that its something wrong? Does he know that we have to be sad when someone dies? I recomposed myself a little and told she wasn’t well and hence she died, he thought and asked me again “Why didn’t she go to a doctor, if she wasn’t feeling well?”. I tried to answer, however the act changed and the music and dance started again catching his attention and he was back to his laughing self in a minute
sleeping in
We pulled over to the side of a narrow "highway" (one must take that word with a grain of salt in the Czech Republic) with lots of fast-moving cars passing just a few feet away. We hosed her off with water bottles. We all may have cried a little. We wished badly we were still at the Kinderhotel with our new friends on the terrace of happiness instead of on the side of a Czech highway covered in vomit.
The chief of staff further added, “Let us not forget about the Pharisees and their movement. Up until a few years ago they had cordial relations with us, but lately their voices can be heard in protest. Plus it is this group that keeps the pot stirred with their endless reading to the people about the Law of that fellow Moses the people revere so much. It would be much to our advantage to silence them as well.”
Once again, I designed the artwork for this year's Asian Celebration poster. The image was colored entirely with Copics. Later this week I will try to post more information about my design process for that image.
In other news...Fat Buddy's back legs are beginning to move! He's discovered that being paralyzed puts him at a distinct disadvantage when food is around to be begged for. It's so pitiful watching him drag himself around when food is in the offing, but also strangely funny. He bitches and complains about everything, but he's determined to get his legs back if only to steal a few more snacks.
More interesting he says “This isn’t any time to sell”. He expects a significant rally point because the market has gone too far too fast and it is oversold. Even so he only has a 60% equity allocation in his mutual funds and in his partnership 35% (before he removes hedges). Leuthold prefers investing outside the US, especially Asia.
Tomorrow...more gentleman's clubs!
The comparison is a very poor one, because John Lennon did not sneak into the country. He was never in the United States illegally, and he applied for legal permanent residence. Certainly he was not brought into the country under harsh conditions by British coyotes who had dreams of reconquista for the red coats and the queen. He was not smuggled into the country to do jobs Americans won’t do, for a minimum wage which he could send back to England. The Nixon administration tried to have Lennon deported because of a prior conviction for marijuana possession, and because John Lennon’s song “Cold Turkey” was about his efforts to quit using heroin. President Nixon figured that if Lennon hadn’t obeyed our laws before he came here, he probably wouldn’t obey them if
sharing this transformation here:
Junior Murvin - Mister Craven
But I do remember one thing my dad used to say all the time. ”Take a shower. You’ll feel better.”
Just one request, if you do go ahead and pull out your cheque book - please can I come to tea?
6. When I was young, I first wanted to be a ballet or jazz dancer, then an interior designer.
I read an NPR article recently which suggested that, every once in a while, we should turn our minds “inside out” and think about things from the opposite perspective. It listed some examples of things done in other countries that are opposite of the way we do them in the US. One such example is that, in some parts of China, people pay doctors for the time they’re healthy, not when they’re sick. Some Chinese doctors emphasize preventative care, so if their patients get sick, it’s said that the doctors haven’t been doing their job and therefore don’t get paid.
‘That’s right. Rosie M. Banks, authoress of Only a Factory Girl, Merveyne Keene, Clubman, ‘Twas Once in May, and other works. You see her name everywhere. I understand she makes a packet with the pen.
I like to see this sort of thing happening. Part of my reasoning behind introducing my workshop group to the idea of 'rules for writing' was to nudge them in the direction of thinking about what was important to them - not to communicate that there's a set of steps you can follow that will equal interesting and/or publishable work. (Although I do think with very beginner writers some general guidelines about 'what happens when you do this' can be helpful in building up confidence).
Good Morning Everyone, Happy Friday!!! YAYYYY another weekend, I am so looking forward to it!!!! Today I would like to share with you a little project I made for Inky Antics, and using their AWESOME Products!!!
I know the war isn't Obama's fault. I mean shit...he was in the fucking Illinois STATE Senate when we got involved, but it's amazing.... If you're against the war, it's Obama's fault because they're still there. If you're FOR the war, it's Obama's fault for being too much of a pussy and pulling out. (I wonder what pervs will happen upon my blog after Google mistakenly leads them here after that last sentence.... Hi Reverend Haggard!! Hi Bill O'Reilly!! Hi Larry Craig!!")
Therefore, this one doesn't really count as a viable option.
And I have to say that I believe that a guy who gives up the vast majority of his wealth and a kidney might just actually mean it.
Includes some furnishings, appliances, dedicated parking spot, electricity, hot water, high speed internet, and an old upright piano.
B2 Dirty Too Long 2:37
I have been drinking chicken soup, miso soup, and tea for several days. But tonight I had a yen for hot chocolate, and it has made me feel better already. Real cocoa, made with Valharona and a little sugar and milk; not that instant stuff that is too sweet and filled with god-knows-what.
The LP is a bit crackly. It was recorded live in 1974.
Penstemon pseudospectabilis..strict warnings relative to over watering accompanied the instructions here, and the common name 'desert beardtongue' sealed the deal. I put it in a large clay pot with a couple of trailing Sedums and a Dudleya caespitosa. The presence of the succulents should deter me from the temptations of watering.
I guess we'll just keep taking it one day at a time and hope that we all come out alive in the end! Until then, every cupboard will be locked, every room blocked-off and everything placed up high on shelves. We can't be too careful around here.
Building on the code from the last article, I can now write a game loop which will check the gamepad data, and set the sprite’s X and Y coordinates during vertical blanking, and whilst maintaining 24 frames per second. I’ve also added a check for the A button, which will increase the speed of the sprite’s movement:
* = w/ The Knocks
The nutrients have been processed out of the grain (and sold to the health food industry). Fortunately for some people today, they are reading labels for the ingredients and trying to make healthier choices of what they consume. But the labels can be misleading. Does one think when something contains natural flavoring it come from an organic source? Probably not, because any food flavoring can be chemically reproduced in a lab and be labeled as natural. Or when they boil vegetables in acid then skim the foam off the top, dry it and put it on the shelf as seasoning people think it’s ok to eat because some food brand we have come to rely on for quality has “pulled the wool over your eyes”. In Europe on October 9th, 2010, Non GMO foods were banned recently and all it took was action by the “people”! Major food producers had to change their formulations in a hurry if they wanted to turn a profit.
As the Jamaican man walks by the coffee shop, his dreads piled in a huge coil underneath his Rastafarian hat, with his entourage of alternative high school students, I sit here blogging, listening to the discussion of today’s news by the locals. They read the hard copy newspapers. I get my news from Yahoo and Twitter. We are of a vastly different generation.
And as I say it louder I love how it sounds
Coming Friday: Remembering Ernie Harwell through a son's new book
(Bound Angle Pose) can cause similar (though usually less severe) pinching of the inner knee, so practice them cautiously, too. Stop going deeper and back off if you feel pressure or pain in the knee. The structures that need to loosen up in these poses are all located around the hip area, so that's where you should feel stretching or releasing sensations as you go deeper.
What is your most favorite thing about Nap? The worst? I love how cocky he is, while at the same time his feelings can be quite easily hurt. He cares deeply about the people who matter to him, even though he doesn’t want to admit it. I like that he desperately wants to be a bad guy but just can’t really manage it for a variety of reasons. My least favorite thing? Hmmm…nothing, really. I enjoy this character and really love writing him and the rest of his crazy crew.
Whatever planets are dancing a little voodoo tango up there at the moment can just stop right now, because I've had enough!
Next is a completely new state for my collection, Alabama. This one comes from Carey:
The basic simplicity of a great idea that is so obvious you can’t believe it’s not been done before.
Of which I wouldn't trade all the presents in the world for, not even a nap with nobody but me.
I have had these boots since I was 20 years old, which makes them very very old. The D-rings are rusty, and the laces need another replacing, but as far as winter boots go, they were one of the best purchases I’ve ever made.
:: Keeping headaches from starting (which I found out are from tension in my neck and shoulders).
I love working with sketch challenges and most of the time follow them exactly...but we all have to start somewhere right?..Well this week Mo's challenge was a sketch challenge and I have made a card for the challenge...this is what the sketch looks like:
Truth lies, Hassan. It is always masked by words. As a storyteller, you ought to know that more than anyone else.
Michael Hayes · Tampa, Florida also added in.
In its promotional material for the sale, Spoons have made much of the fact that they are selling drinks at 1992 prices. And indeed, you can get a pint of Ruddles or a bottle of Becks for £1.29 And Carling is £1.99. But that’s your lot. Apart from coffee at 79p a cup. No wine or spirits offer and, in what seems to be the main rub, no discounted food deals.
Known throughout London for his prowess in the bedroom, Morgan Lyons, the 8th Earl of Westcliffe, cannot forgive an unpardonable affront to his honor. Discovering his young bride in the arms of his brother was a staggering blow–so he banished the beautiful deceiver to the country and devoted himself to the pursuit of carnal pleasure.
If a customer comes to visit you, they are there for a reason!!! With the changing environment of retail, more customers are showing up in stores, informed, educated and ready to buy. Did you catch that?? Ready to buy! The thing is that a lot of customers today want to be given the opportunity to say “yes”. As a sales person, you are viewed as an expert! As a customer, we want confirmation from an expert. By asking for my money, you as the sales person are giving me confidence in my decision.
We switched out organists for the sacrament hymn. I think the young 16-year-old girl I've been training to play the organ REALLY wanted to play! There was a lot of emphasis on the actual sacrament ordinance, which I'm a little conflicted about . . . but, it is what it is I guess. Powers that be know what they want and why.
Base transceiver station (BTS). The base transceiver station (BTS) handles the radio interface to the mobile station. The base transceiver station is the radio equipment (transceivers and antennas)
Hello folks, I am back to my cheery self again and back with you in kink land. today I am excited to announce Molly Malone now on Northern Spanking! How do they keep finding all these sexy girls (well, technically I should know this, but hey ;-)). Here is the synopsis below:
Finished off with Happy Birthday Sentiment.
Hannah Spearritt : In early November 2005, she made her acting comeback in the BBC’s Blessed , an eight part sitcom. In Blessed, she played a minor role, appearing as a member of a fake girl band in two episodes. December 2005 saw Spearritt appearing in the unsuccessful West End musical, Snow! The Musical, at London’s Sound Theatre. The musical was cancelled just three weeks into its run because of poor ticket sales – one show managed to attract an audience of only two people.In 2010 she made a cameo appearance in a short film, Bubble Wrapped produced by her partner. In late 2011 she performed The Belle’s Stratagem where she played the role of Lady Frances. In March 2012, Spearritt will take over the role of Pauline in a play called One Man, Two Guvnors in the Theatre Royal Haymarket.
And to think I’m equally as tired from stressing a little and spending the past two days in a cubicle or on the interstate.
Most of my family has the great fortune to have birthdays either on or near major holidays. Growing up, I just assumed that was normal. Let's see, we have Easter, Fourth of July, Columbus Day, Halloween, Veteran's Day, Thanksgiving, and Christmas. The newest family member was born in late June, so apparently, she didn't read the rule book.
And then there is the coop itself. It was purchased online cheap, site unseen, in kit form. All I can say is that we got what we paid for and I regret not making a better investment or building it ourselves. On the positive side, the chickens love the nesting boxes and will even come back from free ranging to lay eggs inside them. On the negative side, the chickens hate the coop. “Really,” you say, “How can nice chickens hate a nice coop.” “Well,” I reply, “They refuse to use it.” What??? Since introducing them to the coop and allowing them to come home to roost, they have chosen instead not to roost on the roosts. Instead, they sleep on top of the roof. The roof??? Yup, they clumsily fly up to the A-frame roof and sleep like ducks in a row. Fortunately, we had an extremely mild winter, but I am concerned for what next year brings. So below are some photos of what works and what needs improvement.
and yellowing sheets,
Big changes debuted in the October issue of Southern Living magazine. Southern Living always seemed to be a “sister” publication to the recently shuttered Southern Accents, and with their new direction, they might be hoping to attract some of those readers. But, they also seem to be going after the younger Cottage Living reader too. Everything about the magazine now seems geared to a younger demographic, which I think is great. A lot has changed – gone are the tiny pictures which have been replaced with much bigger ones. There are new layouts, graphics, and fonts, and there is new editorial content – such as a Recipes Index, a new Small Scale Decorating Projects column, a Great Southern Drive each month (my fav,) new columns on entertaining and cooking, and there is “Gardening 101” for the novice/weekend gardener. And these are just a few examples of the new columns – there are many more.
PROSPECTS: Director Timur Bekmambitov has some pretty decent genre cred. The book this is based on was quite popular.
A love that makes all seem bright and beautiful
It surprises me sometimes that reminents of my eating disorder are left over. I think that I am so used to living with them that they often go unnoticed. Lately, though I have been trying to be aware of them. These leads me back to my first post on triggers which was several weeks ago. In it I showed what went through my mind when I was ‘triggered’. In this post I want to show what I do (or should do) when I am triggered. So now in response to “The Inner Dialogue of Triggers” I am going to introduce you to the “Inner Response to Triggers”.
1/4 tsp cumin powder
For more information about a particular information evening, please contact the high school office.
Fun, definitely, but not abnormally challenging. There are a few levels actuality and there that can get arresting because they abode that you yield your time, but for the a lot of part, the abandoned levels feel a bit short, admitting there are affluence of them to go around. You’ll get into several bang-up fights forth the way, but some well-placed fireballs achieve quick plan of your foe–and you accumulate adverse the aloft foe over and over afresh in bang-up fights that feel like they were aerial anon from Air-conditioned Mario Bros. 3, with some accidental twists that advance to achieve the battles feel different. But you’re in actuality just aggravating to exhausted Bowser Jr. over and over again, usually by jumping on him unless you accept blaze power, authoritative the bang-up fights appealing underwhelming. Admitting they’re so abbreviate that they don’t accept abundant appulse on the bold one way or the other.
How did you come to be involved in the conference?
When I got home, I threw the bag and notebook on the couch and left them there. I thought about the incident and thought perhaps that he was sure he had made a mistake or perhaps that I had misheard him and that perhaps he might have said "man" instead of "mam". I shrugged it off and thought about it no more.
“The multiplicity of the world crowds in on me with its false set of values. Values weighed in quantity, not quality; in speed, not stillness; in noise, not silence; in words, not thoughts; in acquisitiveness, not beauty.”
Republican presidential candidate and former U.S. senator Rick Santorum campaigns at a tea party town hall meeting, Saturday, in Hixson, Tenn. (John Amis – AP) “everybody in America to go to college.”
I was hesitant at first since cherries aren't in season yet. I was pleasantly surprised to find out these pancakes call for frozen cherries which are available year round. :)
Well, first of all, I dislike hearing people dismissing music as a child’s play and thinking that nothing serious comes out of it.
How much you need: The 2010 Dietary Guidelines for Americans suggest that 20 to 35 percent of your total daily calories should come from fat. Of that amount, less than 10 percent should come from saturated fat. For someone on a 2,000-calorie per day diet, that translates to 65 grams of unsaturated fats.
Toughness. Not excuses. Determination. Maybe they have different methods of getting there, but they do so by doing the work and not looking for shortcuts. Those who I have an interest in reading DON’T post stupid little chit chatty posts about “HOW TO LOOK CUTE IN YOUR RACE PICTURES!!!”
Without her eyes, I wouldn't have had any of these pictures today.
Tan Sri Dr James Masing knows it. He obtained his PhD doctorate degree in anthropology studies and he is an intelligent man. He twisted and distorted the ideals of democracy for a purpose, to defend Datuk Mong Dagang, the Assistant Minister of Modernization of Agriculture.
(Note that this Pauline confession also includes the single-word confessions from the Gospels et al. — that is, “Christ,” “Lord,” and “Son of God.” Also note that, in Paul’s confessions, Jesus is not “Son of God” until his resurrection.)
To make sure that you know what books they want you have to think like a guy. Guys have a few criteria for their books. A good story that is fast paced and unique. A bit of action or something that interests them, like sports or video games. A macho main character. And a cool cover. Guys are as shallow as you think, but only with books. To help you
Don’t miss out on these exciting upcoming sessions and promotions!
You can follow Vela on Twitter right HERE. She’s constantly updating about her studio efforts right now, so you’ll be the first to hear the exciting news of when her debut album finally drops. If you don’t, it’s your loss. But I can guarantee that by the end of the year, you’ll be damn well hearing about her anyway.
Though I've never shaved my head, I relate to Britney because I used to do things to shock other people when I was very young. I did it because I was angry. When you are having an episode your emotions are all out of proportion to what is actually happening. I have always been overly-sensitive and sometimes it reached the level of paranoia. Shocking people was my way of getting back, or showing them that I didn't really care what they thought of me. It was also a way of controlling a situation, I had control over how they felt about me, I may be making them dislike me but it was on my terms.
In this instance, a son got some bad grades and was acting up in school, a fairly common occurrence given the facts that school sucks for most kids and one of the strongest influences on teen behavior is a need for attention and affiliation with other people. In this case, the Dad made him stand on a street corner with a sign that said "I got three Fs . . . blow your horn if something's wrong with that." The other side of the sign asked driver's to honk if the saw something wrong with him being a "class clown."
“In the past few months, @WalmartLabs India has attracted best-of-class talent into the group”, Jeremy King, Senior Vice-President and Chief Technology Officer of Walmart Global e-Commerce, told a press conference here.
The receiver will decode any message in terms of his or her background, knowledge, experiences, etc. etc. etc. These can have huge implications for the message. This is especially true when communicating with someone from another culture or country, even using a common language.
I’m almost off school for the summer. Notice how I said almost. That means that I have a bunch of very important assignments due. And when I have important stuff to do, I procrastinate. In order to assist my procrastination, and celebrate being almost off school, my mom and I went out for lunch.
I ran it through the Argyle embossing folder
Learning about D/s, growing and experimenting...
hahahaha... Peace out!"
Evaluating-Opinion Ranking his plays
That is ALSO what Christmas is all about, Charlie Brown.
We also are putting out a Guest Design Team Call!
Done right, officials at the Army Corps of Engineers say, beach replenishment can be a cost-efficient way to protect a community and provide needed recreational facilities, especially in resort towns dependent on income from tourism. Miami Beach was replenished 10 years ago, in a $65 million dollar project. ”It’s in magnificent condition,” Dr. Houston said.
I drag my suitcase across the lobby and went to the reception desk to finally check out. The receptionist told me to wait for a while as she processes my bill, and as I looked to my right I finally recognize who was standing beside me, checking in at the same hotel. JOYCE VILLAVICENCIO was spelling out her last name to the Singaporean local who’s processing her billeting. I called her and she immediately looked at me. She was, as usual, with her camera, taking pictures of Singapore for an online travel journal. She was joined a few moments later by her now sister-in-law, KOLEEN GREGORIO who specialized in food photography. After some small talk, we finally parted, promising to get in touch once their assignment is done
so that's a success in my book!
Apple crumble
The Zigeunerlieder opened in rather peculiar fashion, one of the two tenors – I shall call him Tenor I – sounding closer in style to Weill than to Brahms; it worked surprisingly well, but I could not help but wonder whether it were intended. More troublingly, however, Harry Christophers, who now joined the ensemble to conduct, drove the music hard. I am not convinced that it needs a conductor; this evening’s experience suggests otherwise. It tends to flow more easily, to sound more ‘natural’ in expression, without. ‘Lieber Gott, du weißt, wie oft bereut ich hab’ benefited from commendable attention to detail, yet, like so many of the songs, sounded over-determined. ‘Kommt dir manchmal in den Sinn’ relaxed somewhat, however, and was all the better for it, permitting one to relish Brahms’s harmonies and their implications. Likewise, there was a nice sense of sad mystery to ‘Horch, der Wind klagt in den Zweigen traurig sacht,’ though there was some especially ropy singing from Tenor II here. Tenor I sounded strained in the closing ‘Rote Abendwolken ziehn am Firmament’; indeed, I was taken aback throughout at the problems both tenors experienced.
Furthermore “there is not such economic blockade as mentioned by The Sun. The only impediment is for vessels flying the Falklands flag to access Mercosur ports. Besides that any vessel and sail in and out of the Falklands”.
Frenzied with grief-induced adrenaline, Amanda yanked open the door to David’s closet and slammed his underwear into a garbage bag.
With nine guests to serve and only seven complete trifles it was obvious the two *different* trifles had to be sent to the table of two,hence leaving seven identical creations for the last remaining table,the seven.
MODIFIED FRAME CLASS
There was a lot of tape on those ones!
So you've had this idea. Chances are the idea is incomplete and actually has a few separate pieces to it. Mostly my ideas come with a vague sense of how it all starts, a couple of really strong, hit-me-in-the-head scenes that probably fit somewhere in the middle, and then a vague sense of how it ends. Your ideas might come with the beginning perfectly formed and no end, or a perfect end and no middle scenes. But whatever, you have to try and figure out how to fit these events together into a plot. How to bridge the gaps between them in a way that makes sense, that is entertaining to read, that is worth writing.
I was a bit startled by this proclamation, but I was intrigued by the derelict’s intuition, since I indeed had never found Mr. Right. I looked at the six items on the belt and saw nothing particularly unusual about my selections that could have tipped off the drunk to my marital status..
Aside: A name’s meaning is really important to me. Though I’m not with anyone and have no plans on having a child anytime soon, I have some baby names picked out. Naming a person bestows on them certain personality traits and I’m very conscious of that when I name characters in a story. Names have to be strong.
“…a reminder of that blood-stained field of Karbala, where the grandson of the Apostle of God fell, at length, tortured by thirst, and surround by the bodies of his murdered kinsmen, has been at anytime since then, sufficient to evoke, even in the most lukewarm and the heedless, the deepest emotion, the most frantic grief, and an exaltation of spirit before which pain, danger, and death shrink to unconsidered trifles.” (A Literary History of Persia, London, 1919, p.227)
All you wanted to have a talk
Yet both camps differ from a classical Christological position as outlined at Chalcedon, in that they both necessitate a genuine change in the divine nature. And even the functionalist view still does violence to a strong view of God’s immutability, let alone his simplicity.
along the harbour front and docks
Whilst some of their sad friends do say,
And Your truth unto the clouds.
Based on the satellite record, before 2005 average January ice extent had never been lower than 14 million square kilometers (5.41 million square miles). January ice extent has now fallen below that mark six out of the last seven years.
What’s the hardest thing about participating in Script Frenzy?
The only catch being that its short notice and I will need to depart on May 30th 2 months before the rest of the Australians heading over with group A.
4 oil
"What was it Mary?" you may be asking.
There's no end to the doodling
I am guardian of freedom and the American way of life.
* Privacy Advisor: Identify which apps can access your sensitive data like contacts, location, SMS text messages & identity info.
Heading to Denver early tomorrow morning. (Mon. Feb. 13th)
"I have great respect for Conservative rabbis who have chosen to follow a different opinion," said Rabbi Ramon, "and for the Reform Movement in Judaism which has long admitted candidates to its rabbinical schools who are practicing gays and lesbians or who favor same-sex commitment ceremonies. However, Jewish Law has traditionally prohibited homosexuality and only sanctifies sexual relations between members of the opposite sex." I wonder if Rabbi Golinkin (with whom I studied Talmud in the late 1980s at Midreshet Yerushalayim, housed at Schechter) has changed his mind, or if he was the one person who voted to abstain in the vote that just happened this last Thursday.
Weight? The hard working adult wren can tip the scales at around 12 grams, just shy of four cents worth. (3.1 grams per one pre-1982 copper penny)
For those that have been following TSM for any amount of time, it should come as no surprise that Mr. Fake and Bake, crocodile tears, Mr. 1%, John Boehner, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, earns the most dubious honor of the Number 1 Bigot of the Year for 2011.
Ah that's OK, I work in liability claims so I'm used to the two-party consent crap.
"Sylvania."
A bit of Home Goods retail therapy after dropping Mom off at the airport turned up the perfect pair, and on clearance for $33 a piece! Seriously, $33 for these big milk glass lamps AND shades. Unheard of! When I got them home, I realized the harps must not be the same size, because when side by side, one shade sits about an inch higher than the other. But when on our nightstands and separated by a bed, you absolutely can't tell.
Beef, cheese, and noodle bake with clementines
The clock is ticking. What will you do with the time you have left? One of my favorite authors, Ronie Kendig is a brilliant writer whose passion for our military shines in her books. I couldn't wait to read her novella, and she delivered in spades! The inner struggles of a soldier, the fierce loyalty to his team, the compassion for the innocent. . .and a surprising discovery all combine to make this the type of high-stakes military drama that has become Ronie's trademark.
Those freedoms helped shaped me as a person, but more importantly, the consequences I’ve lived with have taught me to trust God with all my heart and all my life.
Stop sightseeing, and survey your own scenery.
‘Why not?’
These design patterns are all about Class and Object composition. Structural class-creation patterns use inheritance to compose interfaces. Structural object-patterns define ways to compose objects to obtain new functionality.
Moreover, that phrasing distracts from an alternative view: "the densest residential community in the United States" if built as approved, according to planner (and DDDB board member) Ron Shiffman.
zest of one orange
The story of Joseph in Genesis reveals God’s plan for us that there is no way we can miss it if we read this story from beginning to end. God has the same plan for everyone: repent and believe the gospel and take it to the lost. Heal the sick and cast out devils. Be sure you will suffer along the way.
But I seriously wondered how we can go about the whole fitness program without working out in a gym or enrolling in a class.
While this experience taught me a lot, I think what I took away from it most was Caleb’s own example. He is a Bethel grad, majoring in graphic design. He then became a youth pastor and now is the founder of Unusual Soldiers, a training program for those called to dangerous, dark, and despised places. The thing about it is is that he is from that same no-name town I originally considered a ghost town. He went to Bethel and majored in art. Nothing in his past would suggest that he would travel the world risking his life to bring truth to those that no one else dares to reach, but here he is, making an amazing impact on the kingdom all because he was willing to listen to God. It was really empowering.
3rd and 4th: no details but they were bad
During my first seven years on the faculty, I literally could not teach about the war in Vietnam. This presented a problem each spring, because I was obliged to “finish the textbook” in my Advanced Placement United States History (APUSH) course, which included a fairly superficial treatment of ‘Nam. I surmounted this difficulty at first by lapsing into “anecdotage”: I told my students about ROTC and spun a few yarns about my time in the U.S. Army (1966-1968), but, since I had not been to Vietnam, I could tell no first-hand ”war stories.” I could share some stories I had picked up from friends in the service, but these were related without much effort on my part to establish any sort of context for them or speculate on their veracity.
I’m still around. I haven’t disappeared (yet) in any personal black hole. I’m writing a little bit, and reading your blogs as much as I can, but I just haven’t had that drive to participate much in anything. Even to leave you a comment, beyond the “wow” that usually first comes to mind, seems often an impossible task. I’m very grateful to all those who still think of me, despite my absence…
All I'm saying is that while I was there i witnessed several guys go in,
Me: An earthquake shook, the soldiers fell as if dead, and the stone rolled away. Guess what Jesus did?
The good life is in some degree “contemplative”—that is, it requires the space in which I can scrutinise myself, learn something of self-criticism and thus, potentially, of irony. And for a habit of ironic self-awareness to be generated, we need some concept or image of what is normatively human that does not simply become an oppressive stereotype—a good myth, you might say; we need the saint or hero to illustrate what the well-lived life might look like. This in turn requires, as the authors indicate without too much elaborating the point, a doctrine of the cardinal virtues—another bit of revived Aristotelianism. What are the habits and practices that will educate our passions and allow us to shape a credible narrative of the self, understood against the backdrop of some idea of what the “excellence” of human nature might consist in?
All words and images courtesy of Liz Harris. This is a guest blog post.
More places:
Adil bhai and Haris bhai and BMK DOT….. the most generous being on this earth….. thnx for believing me …… i love bmk when u calls me daktarni…… n thnk u all for praying for me in my exams……. i think i always had cleared bcoz of your wishes…..
Although the world is full of suffering, it is also full of the overcoming of it. -- Helen Keller
why did i put point 2 in **? coz i never got to that stage of rolling and cutting the cookies to my desired shape! my friend, D, bought the same premix and tried it like last week or the week before... she what's app me a picture of her bake... omg, the whole sheet of baking paper was so oily, i was having second thought trying this premix! she told me she put in more shortening than it called for coz the mixture was not forming a dough... hence she keep adding more butter and shortening till she can sort of roll it into balls for baking...
Tofu, cut into 1/2x2x1 inch size
This used to cause me great stress. I would berate myself week after week for failing to get any writing done and the end of every week would feel like failure. But then I decided that if couldn’t change my other commitments, what I could at least change was my attitude.
Me: Doing what? Your JOB? (YES I said this)
It’s easy to get addicted to the adrenaline high of falling scale numbers, especially when you’re doing well at losing weight. It’s just as easy to get addicted to weighing yourself. We’re all consumed by that scale number. Insurance companies tell us what we’re supposed to weigh. Doctors have scale numbers that they consider us overweight, obese, morbidly obese, etc Sometimes we feel it’s all about the scale number! We’re all curious how things affect our weight.
I'm actually a bit farther along than this, but I don't have a new picture. It's practically dark here right now so there's no point trying now. (There's snow on the ground too!) The free pattern for the afghan is here. I decided to go crazy and try a different color scheme, I think I like it so far. And here's Trisha's version, so pretty. I try to knit a row every night or so. At this rate I could finish by the time Amelia starts school.
Hope you've enjoyed the pictures today. It's your last day of school. Hooray you made it to Spring Break. I am looking forward to reading what you do over your holiday. Keep visiting because I am going to post more pictures. I am wondering what I will find today?
“Virtousity”
A fresh new “The Biggest Game In Town” will be available on the web for viewing on or around the 10th of January, 2010. I would encourage everyone reading this to view the documentary and support Mr. Burien in any way you can. For, of all the thousands of men and woman out there fighting against and trying to expose the greed and corruption of our governmental system and its monetary theft of the American people, Walter is the only one who actually has a solution instead of just another perspective on the problem: a peaceful, logical, economically viable, and extremely achievable grass-roots solution – but only with our help.
1448 **D-XI/26/2002. “How to Begin to Think About the Good.” Jurisprudence Course, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2003(2), above, pp. 773-79.) D-2003
7. Memphis Grizzlies
Ring it out guys! Great news filtering through from The Clarity of Night Ascension Contest. Our great blogging buddy Pete Dudley has pipped 124 other entries to take the top prize. His entry, Sliding, was wonderful. Jason's nose for talent is fairly spot on and several previous winners have gone on to become published. I wish all the same fantastic fortune to Pete. Congrats mate.
Which is why I was up late. Because I had to sit with SH while he went through every single record to correct the donation dates, even though I pointed out to him that in the 25 years before I had married him and had been doing my own taxes, I had never been 1. audited or 2. imprisoned. Which meant that it took a while to complete the taxes. Which never should have waited until the night before they were due, anyhow.
At the time, this was considered a bit inhibiting as most bands still went out on tour to hawk their wares instead of lounging around whilst their marketing company drummed up a bit of business (I know, what were they thinking?) Whatever, it has a strange beguiling atmosphere that Who singles hadn’t had up to that date yet it still majors on the staple Who ingredients of the restlessly manic drumming of Keith Moon and the windmill chords of Pete Townsend. Its almost whispered verse leading to a relentlessly rising chorus is one of Townsend’s crowning achievements. There is a tension throughout the whole piece that is not fully resolved and gives it a twitchy, slightly anxious quality.
Softcover
Sorry for my youthful judgment, Target. I have since repented.
it makes me want to vomit. i get nervous. i don't like anticipation.
It's high time these brews were on board, and I can't wait to get properly acquainted with every one of them.
5. Wash, dry and place all the lettuce in a large salad bowl. Mix the onions in.
5 stop
Tristram Shandy by Laurence Sterne
The writing is pretty much exactly the same as the first book. Lots of useless information and sentences that say in twenty words what could easily have been said in ten. This frustrates me and I sigh about it an awful lot, but it's clearly not a dealbreaker for me since I keep reading these books. If you managed the writing in the first book, then you'll manage the writing in Allegiance.
Sir John Chilcot: Quite… now, if you please…… the events leading up to the war?
MP4-27 in detail
Alice Cooper-vocals, guitar, harmonica.
Psychologists reckon that this is essential for survival at this stage of our lives. However, although necessary, too much "ego" can eventually become a heavy burden.
The moment of confrontation with which he ends up is not only a moment in which we confront the other side. It is also a moment in which we finally have to confront the fact that we’re actually not free, and the fact that the capitalist class and its agents won’t allow us to hollow out their state until it collapses. It’s a shame that this is where Graeber ends up. It should have been where he began.
I used My Mind's Eye papers and Prima flowers and bird's nest.
If you have long fingernails or just got your nails done in the nail shop, you better get one of those disposable glove.
Peter and I go out to dinner once a week. And I find myself storing up things to tell him—the way William called the ducks “quack, quack” at the beach, the email I received from a friend I haven’t heard from in a while, my response to a story on NPR. Somehow, whether it is mundane details of my day or profound news, telling him makes it seem complete. Love is like that. It spills over. It can’t be contained.
Most people I know like to succeed and to achieve goals and get the results that they want. Despite good intention, something gets in the way and stops them fully achieving all they want.
John, Sr.’s brother Paul Bremond started several Texas railways. One, the Houston East & West Texas, or HE&WT (“Hell Either Way Taken” as some said), serviced the forests of East Texas, and got the nickname “The Rabbit” because of its jumpy cars and bumpy tracks. But Paul also organized the Galveston & Red River Railway, which came to Austin in 1871 under its later name, the Houston & Texas Central Railway.
So there are guidelines, and if you have even a small brain, you learn the guidelines; certain flavours like to hang out, others despise the sight of each other. Some stuff you do, some stuff you don’t. There are techniques that will prevent you from chopping your finger off, and rules to prevent you from poking someone else in the eye with your knife…
I wish I was that smart when I was eight.
flip-floppery.
chica
Now to be clear, a state that, in the 21st century, voted 2-1 to keep the Confederate battle logo as part of its state flag (you don't really see it flying much in any of the come-to-Mississippi tourism commercials, do you?) doesn't really care what us Texans, DOJ, or anybody else thinks about them. They ousted Geo out of their own self interest, so as another of GEO's customers, Texas should naturally consider why.
Tier B--This tier is for people who have never been to my house before, friends who have house cleaners that they pay to clean their houses and our friend Joe who runs a housecleaning business. For this tier, I do everything mentioned above but I will do some light dusting, clean the upstairs bathroom, the kids rooms, bake a yummy goody and make sure that everything looks nice and cozy.
1 1/2 tsp. vanilla extract
Look at these and tell me it doesn't make your heart skip a beat or two.
that love
I wanna hold her hand
While that was happening I used the template provided to produce the lid. This was then used to cut the required shapes onto white card. (The top shape is actually round, it just wouldn't lie flat - that's what happens when you use greaseproof paper from a roll!)
To begin with, think about the times in your life when you have been happy. Knowing what you were doing during your happiest moments will give you insight into what you should really be doing with your life.
I love how this turned out. I hope my hostess likes it, too!
And I am pretty sure our SAG cards aren't coming in the mail any time soon either.
Those familiar with scripture will readily recall that the heart has a prominent place in both testaments.
Seriously, a Symphony bar wrapped in brownie?
Sugar- 2 tsp (as per taste really)
2. Chinese Rocks (not on original R.I.P.)
I'm almost scared to post this review as so many people have enjoyed 2666 but as I received my copy free from Vine I feel duty bound to post my thoughts. To be completely honest I couldn't get to grips with the story. I found it too long-winded and difficult to get to into. The author's writing style didn't flow for me, either. I was so looking forward to getting stuck into this hefty book but sadly it wasn't to be. However, I seem to be in the minority as most reviews I've read for 2666 have been enthusiastic and full of praise. I think this is one book that I will come back to at a later date for another try.
Well enough sulking for today, I’m supposed to rev you up and inspire you on a Monday. So here is a recipe that I have found on the heart foundations website. They have set up a great group that is called Mum’s united. I have signed up to their facebook page and it’s basically a forum where other Mum’s share their tips and tricks to help their families have a healthier life style.
Tonight, our sssspecialsss are
Immensely.
in Highland Park in decades when we christened the Little Cave in
The Times ran an article on the Lindbergh flight over the South Atlantic, documenting not only the flight, but giving Mrs. Anne Morrow Lindbergh credit for keeping the world below their airplane informed on what was taking place as they flew high above the ocean.
The one funny thing... I'm now in size 12 clothes, and they are still fitting like a glove! I gained almost 10 pounds, but my clothes didn't change in fit AT ALL... that is just WEIRD!
There are so many hand crafts I'm itching to try; for now, time forces me to be content with crocheting, some very basic knitting, and occassional candle-making, but I can always hope I will have more leisure in the future, right? :-) I'm also doing some very simple beading now, with Shira, which we both greatly enjoy.
Now for those of you who aren't familiar with Sarah, she's a quilting angel (don't be mislead by the whole sweatshop thing ). She has a group of quilters who make quilts for the ministry and people in need. Just a little something to show there's someone that cares and tries to warm their hearts. I know she's warmed mine. Sharon at Vrooman's quilts (another quilting angel) had a great idea to donate your blocks to Sarah's cause. That is definitely not required, it's just one angel thinking like another and a great idea.
Rep. Kathy Hochul, who won a special election last year to represent the 26th Congressional District, signed a contract last month lobbyist Bolton-St. Johns to represent her campaign. Towns has the lobbyist Hank Sheinkopf who took the 5th in front of the NYS IG investigating the AEG contract scandal looking out for his interest. Members of New York’s House delegation, for instance, pumped about $378,000 from their own campaign accounts into the coffers of state lawmakers in Albany during the last election cycle, according to an analysis of state campaign records by the New York Public Interest Research Group, a government watchdog organization, as normally obscure legislative races drew strong national attention with the redistricting battle looming. *
I started with cutting out a standard 5x6.5 inch card. I added the Pop Kut Lattice Butterfly BKD010 by Judy Stark and some self-adhesive rhinestones. A simple card that will speak volumes with a personal message added inside to Mom!
2. I quietly put on my coat and got in our battered pickup.
JR: Vashti, I am told you have just received a four year scholarship to college…tell me about this.
You can relish this addictive tangy and crunchy Red Carrot Pickle immediately with your meal. Refrigerate after use. Mangai inji ( a variety of ginger with mango flavour ) can also be used instead of normal ginger for its special flavour.
European Space Agency(ESA)
Sitting there beside the spread out jacket he took off his boots and socks, his shirt and then his pants, and started walking about the lawn in his T and whitie-tighties.
And finally, my favorite
Forgive me readers, it's been two months since my last confession.
shortly afterwards by the killing of a four innocent Jews – a young schoolteacher and two of his small children and then a third little girl – are receding into the background. Not for the families, not for the friends. Perhaps not entirely for Toulouse and Montauban. But probably for France. Certainly for Europe and the rest of us. The tragedy becomes an event, and the event turns into a small bump
Notice that we are thinking about an impossible past condition. You did not win the lottery. So the condition was not true, and that particular condition can never be true because it is finished. We use the past perfect tense to talk about the impossible past condition. We use WOULD HAVE + past participle to talk about the impossible past result.
I don't have any idea how to change it back. I guess something was altered at the template.
BAD picture alert!! I didn’t think to take pictures until halfway started, so there are some grab and click moments.
If you are looking for a way to spice up your tangling, The Tangled Fashionista is a fun way to do so. It isn't the book for someone looking to learn about zentangle or new patterns, but will provide enjoyment for someone who wants to move away from the pure abstract of the traditional zentangle, for a while.
When they had finished eating, Jesus said to Simon Peter, “Simon son of John, do you truly love me more than these?”
Rainy Day Woman
I look forward to returning to consistent blogging once the chaos dies down.
It is well known that Tintin has been delighting children and adults alike since 1929, when he began his adventures as a boy reporter traveling the world and setting wrongs to right. Created by Georges Remi, the Belgian artist better known as Herge, Tintin’s adventures became one of the greatest early examples of the European strip cartoon. The strip cartoon, or comic strip was originally an American creation, but one which Belgian artists quickly adopted and improved upon. Herge’s work is a stellar example of the style called “the clear line.” Many of the images, which together comprise a story, can be viewed as self-contained illustrations. Herge was able to achieve this effect without disrupting the flow of the story.
My dress looked wonderful. The last time I wore it, I put a turtleneck underneath the dress so that I would not freeze. Not this time! I never wear anything sleeveless, because I am always nervous about people seeing my arms. However, last night I did not care.
In such a jocund company: I gazed—and gazed—but little thought What wealth the show to me had brought: For oft, when on my couch I lie In vacant or in pensive mood, They flash upon that inward eye Which is the bliss of solitude; And then my heart with pleasure fills,
“Do you not see, Sister?” Lakosha demanded. “We are no longer alone in our fight against the Legion. We are no longer running from our conflicts, but making a stand with our allies. We are no longer a single entity that focuses on our own problems, but one that helps out those who have help us! Our allies need our assistance, no matter how small, on the many fronts that they fight!”
I go and sit by the Raspberry Tree;
I should be ecstatic. I did text a few people to let them know my good news, and heard happy replies from all. Bless my dear friends hearts, Camaree and Kyle even took me to dinner to celebrate at my new favorite restaurant in Parowan Utah, called the "Dairy Freeze" - just an FYI they have the best ice cream ever! But alas, my fire has gone out. Now I am just a glowing ember in the pit of once was a blazing fire. Maybe student teaching (FOR REAL) this time will ignite my glowing ember into a full fledge fire, or it could just burn out completely. Only time will tell, but if I burn out it's okay because I have been making other plans - "when plan B doesn't work out there are 25 other letters in the alphabet."
If you want to start, give me the link to your character, and I will introduce you into the campaign.
heart rate of your 60-plus
Hi again friends!
In saying that, software above the level of a single device isn’t limited to mobile devices, or smart phones. It lends itself to any device that has connection to the Internet, and seeing the cost of processors in this day and age has significantly reduced since its birth, we’re seeing many more objects or devices equipped with such forward technology.
""In her autobiography Being and Becoming Myrna Loy referred to the way she was cast in exotic roles in her early film and dismissed her participation in Ham and Eggs at the Front as ‘shameful’:
66. The looks ah de pudding is not de taste. You should not always take things by their looks.
I made a list to start projects this year of things that only bring me joy.
Bob, a rooster, lived with a bunch of chickens. The chickens clucked all day long, and so did Bob: “Cluck, cluck, cluck.”
Thanks, Jay!
Who knows how human habitation and disregard for the many ecosystems of the world already affect the weather patterns as we know them today. I contemplated this as a storm system passed through the area where I live. I don’t remember winds so strong at that time of year. I observe many strange changes in the weather I can’t explain.
Henry stayed at his Nanna's house on the weekend, which was both awesome and terrible!
“There is no fear to play, just feeling the spirit to enter the stadium and started it,” said Vincent Kompany to AGEN BOLA Manchester Evening News, Saturday (04/28/2012).
05 - Clusters N.2
In my ever growing excitement for this summer's Prometheus, I revisited the afore-mentioned H.R. Giger's Alien, and it looks like to me, from the trailers that are now available for viewing online, that Ridley Scott is revisiting the ground-breaking artwork that this crazy guy created for 20th Century Fox (that was scrapped from the 1978 film). Here are my comparisons.
There was an old herring that lived in a shoe
Keep Prepping Everyone!!!!
Eleanor Blayney, president of Directions LLC, said female clients don’t want to sit around comparing benchmarks with performance numbers — something male clients often want to do. But that doesn’t mean women don’t care about results.
two empty Buddy Fruit pouches (seriously, everything we eat does NOT come from a pouch. i promise.)
Wynkoop Brewing Company B3K Schwarz Bier
“By no means an animal lover, Betty, only a husband at the end of his tether! When I met Renate in the street, she told me that Tigerli had also played amorous games with her leg.
Anyways, I have a great but super easy + fast project to share today. It is a Valentine Lollipop Gift Favor. I just score and glue some cardstock and add MayArts Ribbons. Voila! I just finished a quick Valentine treats.
And you beside me
Kelsay declined to describe what police found at the home. A search warrant was being written. He said family members of the Sueppels came to the scene.
I have not spoiled anything about the film (even though I have noticed that other film reviewers have given a spoiler warning about the film) in revealing that there is a tryst between the mother and the father of her children; nor does it really matter that the woman, Jules (Julianne Moore), is married to another woman, Nic (Annette Bening). The primary dilemma of The Kids Are Alright is not whether or not Jules will "turn" straight (no, that is a dilemma for a much more idiotic movie) and confess her undying love for the father of her children. That man's name is Paul (Mark Ruffalo), and it is not important, either, that we think of him as a home wrecker. These are frivolous things that have no place in this screenplay. This is not a film about surprise twists or revelations; this is not a film about secrets trysts and sitcom conventions; no, here is a film that has all of these elements but executes them in a way that is smart and clever. In summary: We care not that Jules and Nic are lesbians – it's not the point – the point is, and it's stated rather brilliantly through the editing and the framing (the things that are not said), that relationships are hard, especially when you've been at them for a while.
The event puts the audience face-to-face with the issues and outcomes of drug and alcohol abuse, ranging from illegal substances to prescription medications and household items.
mistress-piece, "The Dreaming"? While far from a flop, the
One doesn’t need to be a priest or a rocket scientist to contribute to that motion. Each of us can do it day in and day out with what we know. We are also free to learn more so as to do it more effectively and more efficiently.
Which will make sense if you read clear through the Post
5. Present the TMI Blog Award to 5 – 10 deserving blogs.
But not all development is good. Even the best plans and intentions can have adverse social and environmental impacts – and yes, development can even result in adverse economic consequences for the country.
Sometimes it is just easier to stay home and watch Fear Factor. I'm too stubborn to do that. Practice makes closer-to-perfect.
The cast is truly superb. They were good in each of their own movies i.e Iron Man, Captain America and Thor but together they make it even better.They make the perfect group and the chemistry between all the actors works well. Here’s a list of who’s who in the movie – First the people we already know : Robert Downey Jr as Iron Man, Chris Evans as Captain America, Chris Hemsworth as Thor , Scarlett Johansson as Black Widow. Jeremy Renner joins the cast as Hawkeye and Mark Ruffalo as The Hulk. Each of the characters get equal importance in the movie so you get see all of them on their own and as a team. Tom Hiddleston is “Loki” , Thor’s adoptive brother and Villain of the year.
The current system is failing sufferers and things will not change until these sorts of findings are integrated into GP care programmes. Government acceptance is one thing, but it needs to be carried through to the patient. There are currently over 4,000 published papers that indicate the biological nature of ME. How many more times do these papers need validating before the findings are used to provide effective treatments?
After researching writing programs available for Mac OS X, I decided to download and register Scrivener. I was impressed with all of the writing programs; they fit the requirements for various novice and professional writers. Maybe someday I’ll own a copy of each one. I am amazed how far the technology has evolved since the personal computer was created. It didn’t take long to decide what I was going to do.
For my part, I only fired 36 rounds, and I was done in about ten minutes. Still, when I finished shooting and went to get my targets, one of them had to snark at me when I came back up.
Context on the show: Homer and his friends are watching the local college football teams play in a rivalry game. As a graduate of Springfield University Homer is legally bound to make fun of his friends Lenny and Carl, both of whom root for Springfield A&M. Lenny defends his alma mater with the above.
Many a time we have said something or done something and our children have come out with something worth a smile or a grimace. Here are a few quotes from our youngest daughter.
Arshavin came in for TR7 and made a big impact on the game.
I then started exploring the economics and practicalities of such a project.
I’m trying to start that voice playing in my kids’ heads. I often ask the girls, midstream in some activity, “What’s the first (or second or third, etc) rule?” Bringing a rule into my consciousness often feels like pressing a pause button for me. It seems to have a similar effect on Ada and Esme, if for no reason other than it makes them stop their current activity for a split second to think outside of themselves.
Day off from work today. Came home at 4 in the morning, again. (though it was worth it, chuckles) That's why I took a three-hour nap in the afternoon, which was a baaad idea coz naps always get my head all messed up. They don't really suite me, no no. I've been alone at home for a while now, so there's no mom to cook for me (but I'm not helpless, I do know how to cook, I'm just lazy hah) so haven't been really eating properly. So today when I finally had to eat something, my stomach got all messed up. just wondering: how is that possible?!
My sex drive was put together wrong, Dan. What the fuck do I do? Live alone and hope Japan starts producing affordable sexbots before I’m too old to care?
In addition, how about cutting out foreign aid? That amounts to about 19 billion per year. Add that to the total and we begin to move in the right direction, not to mention reduced funding for our enemies.
And, like in most cults, their direction seeks dominion over personal lives and decisions.
I could not believe what had just happened.
I don’t know whether he did confess because I never did visit his parents, but I imagine that I’d taught him a good lesson.
Cold Process Oven Process: This is when after the soap is brought to trace, all botanicals, colorants, and essential oils have been stirred in, and the soap is poured into the mold - just like in Cold Process, BUT, now it goes into the oven for a specified temp and time and then the oven is turned off and the soap finishes curing in the oven as the oven cools down.
my song will kiss your heart
I, though, was very excited because I'd missed all of the reps that IDT Energy carpeted Brooklyn with earlier this year, and I've been itching to debate deregulation with them (I'm an electricity markets nerd). Unfortunately, the gentleman that spoke to me decided he would need to pass my questions on to a supervisor and I had some bolognese sauce burning, so we had to end it there.
